TOWARD CAMERA along the tracks. In CLOSE F.G. is.the back

part of a sign.

To most of America in 1913, the Age

of Innocence had arrived and the

stories of the Indian Wars and the

Gold.RuSh and the Great Gunfighters

had become either barroom ballyhoo

or front-porch remiraiscences... .But

on both sides of the $io Grande men

and 1 80's -- unchanged. men in a

changing land.

THEY WEAR THE KHAKI UNIFORMS OF THE UNITED STATES CnVALJRY..

The horses bear the government brand and the saddles are

regulation.

PIKE BISHOP,. wearing lieutenant's bars, rides slightly ahead

of the others. He rides stiffly; always slightly in pain...

Pike is a not unhandsome, leather-faced man in his early

forties. A thoughtful, self-educated top gun with a penchant

for violence who is afraid of nothing - except the. changes

in himself and those around him.

Make no mistake, Pike Bishop is not a hero -- his values are

not ours -- he is a gunfighter, a criminal, a bank. robber, a

killer of men. His sympathies are not for fences, for

trolleys.and telegraphs or better schools. He lives outside

and against society because he believes in that way of life

and if he has moments of sympathy for others, moments of

regret, t hey ' are short lived. He is not a 'good man'

according to the righteous... To them he is totally bad,

and he wouldn't have it any other way.

Next to him DUTCH ENGSTROM wears the uniform of a sergeant.

Dutch is bigaz good-natured with a fast gun hand, strong

loyalty and, like Pike, a bone deep distaste for rules and

regulations. He can sing,. has more than his share of charm,

but believes in nothing except two men, and Pike is one.

Behind them ride two brothers, LYLE and TECTOR GORCH,

dressed as corporals. Lyle and Tector are big, tough, hot

tempered and sudden. They work together, eat together and

sometimes sleep together with the same whore. Brutal,

vicious in a fight, illiterate,. they are always pressing

for an advantage and once they get it -- they never let go.

They are without loyalty or honor, to anyone except each

other and that is limited.

A fifth man wears the single stripe of a PFC. This is. AL'GEL.

Angel is a good-looking, bilingual Mexican boy in his middle

20's who has seen so much blood and violence and cruelty

under Diaz that he rebelled -- but his rebellion was not with

Villa or Obregon, his was a one-man revolution against them

all. He believes in his family, his village and the inherent

dignity of. man (some men at least). " He is faster than his

companions with a gun -- and a better shot -- but he can't.

laugh at the loss of love or suffer the loss of pride --

Mexican pride - a pride that can kill him, but if it does,.

he will have no regrets.

REACHING THE SIGN THE MEN STOP. Witut.speaking they, begin

to brush off their clothing and get their uniforms in order.

PIKE' AND ' DUTCH STARE FOR A MOMENT AT THE SIGN, slightly

bemused. _

Make you feel welcome?

It helps..

What's it say?

(baiting him)

It invites us to stay with the community

and grow. It is here, perhaps with time

and small miracle -- that you could be

taught to read.

Tector looks at Angel for a long moment, then turns to Pike.

I never enlisted to serve with no

smart-mouthed kid.

Nor I with dogs.

(grinning at Pike)

ranks.

(t0 Teotor and Angel)

Itll transfer both of you -- just one

more word.

They look at him silently. He means it. Finally Tike spurs

his horse and the group sta'ts for town, CAMERA PANNING. THEM

PAST. THE STATt.ON Ai12M BOXCARS into a side street.

with weekend visitors. Men,. women and children are. milling

about, shopping and idly trading gossip.. The town.has the

look of turn of the century Americana along with its.Spanisn

heritage. The group of soldiers enter almost unnoticed.-

Riding downethe street they pass:

A LARGE TENT IN FRONT OF WHICH IS A BANNER ANNOUNCING a

W.C.T.U. meeting, which, according to the SOUNDS of the bass

drum and a sermon denouncing rum, is presently going on

inside.

Leviticus. 10.9. Do not drink wine or

strong drink thou,nor thy sons with

thee least ye die. It shall be a

statute forever. Look. not though. upon.

the. wine when it. is red when it giveth

his color in the cup when it moveth

itself aright at the last it biteth

like a serpent and stingeth like an

adder.

That is in the good book.. but here in

this town, it is five cents a glass.

Five cents a glass, does anyone think

that that is really the price of a

----drink? The price of a drink let him

decide who has lost his courage and his

pride and who lies a govelling heap

of clay not far removed from a beast

today.-

I hereby solemnly procaise, God helping

me, to abstain from all di stilled, fer-

mented and malt ligi34rs3 including wine,

beer and cider, and to employ all proper

means to discourage the Ilse of and.

traffic in the same.

ABE,. PHIL AND BURT, at the hitching rail on one side of the

street,. turn and keep pace with the group on horseback.

THE YELLOW AND BROWN RAILROAD ADMINISTRATION BUILDING. As

they swing out of the saddle the other ' soldiers' join them.

1l.' PIKE AND HIS COMPANIONS REMOVE EMPTY SADDLE BAGS FROM their

horses and step onto the boardwalk or sidewalk that surrounds

the'square. Some passersby look curiously.

(after a moment, a little

Fall in -- and follow me.

The men,. with the 'exception of Tector, Phil and Abe, shuffle

into a ragged column of twos.

12. PIKE MOVES DOWN THE FILE, looks around.

14. PIKE PAUSES. FOR A MINUTE and behind him the men surreptitious-

ly touch their holstered forty-five automatics. Pike leaves

the boardwalk, crossing toward. the railroad office. Tector

and Phil stay with the horses.

(removing his hat)

Beg pardon, Ma'am.

(as she stops)

Let. me, Ma'am.

Dutch picks up the package, Pike offers the lady his arm.

She hesitates, accepts. Pike and Dutch, followed by the

others, lead her across the 'street.

THE CROWD BELOW, THEIR RIFLES AT THEIR SIDES Behind them.

on the flat of the roof are open bedrolls, and the remains of

at least three meals. It is hot., they have been there a -long

time, and they are tired.

HARDCASES -- frowns a little as he watches the soldiers in

the street below. It is. hotter than hell on the tin roof and

he is sweating heavily. He turns, edges forward, then nudges:

18, DEKE THORNTON SITTING NEXT TO HIM, his back against the wall,

Thornton is a hard-bodied, quiet-spoken man, with a lined

face and the embittered manner of someone who has changed

sides to stay alive and while part of his life has gone out

of him with the change, the personal integrity by which he

has lived is still. intact.

little.

(after a long moment)

He's there.

The bounty hunters react and prepare to fire. Over this shot

is the sound of Pike calling to Thornton -- from the past.

19 PIKE REACHES THE DOOR AND WITHOUT PAUSING, murmurs 'goodbye'

to the lady and enters, followed by the others,

20 ON THE ROOF, HARRIGAN WHIRLS ON HIS MEN as they begin aim-

aing, ready to fire..

Hold your fire; -- We wait till they come

out -- catch them in the act.

20A THORNTON, WRISTS LASHED TO THE BARS OF THE CELL'S window,

is being whipped by a guard.

20B THORNTON on the rock pile is making little ones of big ones.

.standing by the horses.

I can nail himl

He said wait.

What if they go.out back?

It's covered, you two-bit rednecked peckerwood.

The men settle slightly. Thornton remains tense -- then turns as:

What -you meant to do does not interest

me What you did --

Then, seeing:

24 PIES AND THE OTHERS waiting, he steps to the ody window,

smiling with the thought that their visit means. military

business for the railroad. His mood. changes as the men draw

their\guns and Pike steps towards him.

(reaching for air)

What is it?...What do you want?

25 DUTCH., LYLE AND THE. OTHER MEN SWIFTLY MOVE behind the

counter. Pike ignores the paymaster and turns to:

26 CRAZY LEE STRINGFELLOW,. a young, compulsive killer with just

tip!)

pump shotgun angled up at:

HATCHET-FACED HARRIDAN IN HER FIFTIES i,iho enters the office

carrying. a.wrapped package and is instantly shoved into. a

corner with the other prisoners.

28 ON THE STREET -- THE W.C.T.U. BASS DRUM BOOMS CLOSER as the

parade picks up kids and other scoffing supporters as it

moves around the square. . People and their children are

crowding through the trees to the boardwalk to watch the band.

and group of believers following the_,. in a formation that is

almost as rigid as. their song and their faces.

Damn them!

The parade moves toward the saloon.

They should have been told:

Told-what!? Sus t how. long do you think

anyone in this manure pile can keep his

mouth shut?

Before Thornton can answer:

30 T..C.. SHIFTS TO CHANGE POSITION and his hand. touches the tin

roof, ,causing him to.yelp with pain.. The others snap a look

in his. direction, then freeze as:

31 'VECTOR ON THE BOARDWALK. LOOKS UP,. SEES NOTHING, leans back

against a rail watching the horses and the hymn singers.

After a moment, he smiles a little, beating time,. as he

remembers some forgotten march he watched from his daddy's

shoulders.

FROM THE PARADE GROWS LOUDER. He looks out Behind hi::

3.3 PIKE AND THE OTHERS ARE LOADING SACKS OF SILVER into their

saddle bags. They are almost ready to. leave.

The paymaster, his assistants and the customer, their hands

still up, watch C.L.

Trash -- Filthy trash!

(gently.)

You just. hush now --

People marching and singing coming

down the street -- going to pass near

the horses.

Well, we'll just join in.

Angel, turning away, hesitates, looking up through the window

Waiting for us

Son of a bitch

He turns and crosses quickly to the back door. Dutch

follows. Pike opens it a little, looks ou.t at.

HATS -- they are surrounded. -

37 IN THE OFFICE -- DUTCH JOINS PIKE AT THE DOOR and looks out,

then curses softly.

How in hell could they have known

we were coming?

How in hell do I know?

Where do we go?

Out front -- that's where the horses

are..

He shuts the door, crosses toward the paymaster.

-Besides, when I travel, I like my feet

to dangle.

(indicating the prisoners)

I kill 'em-now?

(after a moment)

No. You just hold them here and wait

as long as you can -- after the shooting

starts.

111-1 hold 'am till hell freezes over

or you say different !

Pike, pushing the frightened paymaster in front of him,

hesitates., looks. at C.L., then continues to . the door, grabs

the handle, looks back again.

39 DUTCH, ANGEL AND THE OTHERS look at Pike. They are ready.

40 PIKE JERKS OPEN THE DOOR,. KICKS THE terrified paymaster out

into the street.

MIDST OF THE BAND,. screaming as the gunfire cuts him down.

The marchers are frozen for a brief instant, then scatter in

terror as:

THE ROOF. -- RTJNNING TO THEIR HORSES. through the' screaming,

terrified marchers.

INTO THE OFFICE. The sound of the band is drowned out by

gunfire and screams. C.L. frowns a little.

They was playing "Gather at the

River." You know that one?

(as they quickly nod assent)

Then sing it Z

AND THEY DO, ALL OF THEM, THEIR VOICES RISING. WITH FERVOR and

C.L. joins them, marching up and down,. waving the shotgun in

time to the music.

COVER, some collide with the bandits,. some hit by the cross-

fire fall wounded in the dusty road.

falling.to the street. below as.

ANGEL AND LYLE BOTH FIRING rapidly, almost simultaneously,

kill. one. man and then another. Two others are wounded by

the bandits' fire.

BANDITS MOUNT their plunging horses.

THORNTON TENSES, RECOGNIZING PIKE. He hesitates, then lifts

his gun to fire.

HESITATES, recognizes Deke, then snaps off a shot which

misses Thornton and kills SHEP, a bounty hunter firing

beside him. Thornton fires and:

is hit and falls into the street..

THE WILD BUNCH SWING ONTO THEIR HORSES AND WHEEL them around, I

but two are hit, Burt is barely able to control his hors 1,

theother , Abe , dies with his animal

PIKE MOUNTS AND GALLOPS HEADLONG INTO THE FRANTIC CROWD, some.

of his men. following, others splitting off in different

directions.. Behind them,. two lie dead in the street.

stops, looks out a the window, laughs with delight at the

excitement, turns:.

He-lifts his shotgun, yells for them to halt.

56 IN THE STREET - FRANK, WOUNDED EARLIER, FALLS FROi HI S

HORSE, dumping his laden saddle bags. His. foot hangs in the

stirrup and his horse drags him after the others. The horse

is shot and goes down -- Frank struggles to his feet, is out

down as:

then spurs through the crowd, past Frank and into the tent.

Horse, man and tent go down in a cloud of dust and canvas.

Then, the horse,. Dutch still in the saddle, rises, breaks

clear and races away.

58. A WOMAN, 'BLIND WITH TERROR, SPINS TO THE GROUND as she runs

into Pike I s horse as it slides to: a halt as Pike a turns to

help Dutch.

A TERRIFIED CHILD STANDS and holds its ears, screaming as the

horses thunder past.

61 HARRIGAN AND THORNTON. AS THEY TRY TO STOP THEM, KICKnr G T-B:'IR

fight them off and. keep firing.

ride for the edge of town.

63 ON ANOTHER STREET A CITIZEN AIMS A PISTOL AND FIRES. The

shot hits'. I

61 BURT'S HORSE, CAUSING THE ANIMAL TO CAREEN WILDLY. It

the glass window of a store.

67 THE BIRDSHOT CATCHES BUCK IN THE FACE,.:: BLINDING HIM... He

68 LYIE. GORCH KILLS THE BOY WITH ONE SHOT- .. and rides on.

69 BUCK HANGS DESPERATELY ONTO THE HORN as- his horse follows the

others.

70 ON THE ROOF -- THO RNTON AND HARRIGAN FINALLY FORCE the bounty

hunters to cease firing after the wild bunch.

PULLS UP HIS HORSE AND WHEELS around to see if they are being

followed, kicking loose a lady's shawl tangled in his stirrup.

72 NOBODY IS FOLLOWING - NOT YET.. Pike spurs his horse and

(The six bandits remaining are Pike, Dutch, the Gorch

brothers, Angel and Buck, now blinded..)-.

73- THE CARNAGE LEFT BY THE GtJNFI IT

WOMEN AND CHILDREN are sobbing hysterically while townspeople

move among the dead and dying, ineptly trying to help.

78 THORNTON MOVES SLOWLY BEHIND THEM, cursing. softly as he.

watches the men rush to bodies like a. puck of wild. dogs in

a gut wagon -- they smell. blood and have forgotten the leash..

79 COFFER AND THE SOUTHERNER,. T.C. NASH, are stripping the

pockets of one body while arguing over whose shot killed the

man. Harrigan runs toward them.

Well, just dig it out and see. if it

ain't my,... 06 S

(pointing to the paymaster)

You stupid damn fools! ... How could you

shoot this employee and let the others

get away?

I didn't shoot that old. boy...-My first

shot killed this man. right here.

(overlapping, crossing

to another body)

He's lying'. Him and them others was

shootin' that old 'employee' full of

holes while I was droppin' this bandit

and them others too -- I must've killed

all three of 'em, sir, while --

Maybe we all did.

(crossing to him)

But by God the next time you plan

your massacre a little more carefully

...or I'll begin it with you!

You'll begin a trip back to Yuma Prison

if you don't learn to keep your mouth

shut l Why - in hell didn't you kill Pike

when you had the chance?

But Thornton doesn't answer -- he turns, listening to:

"Shall we gather at the river

Where bright angels rise and fall

Shall we gather at the river

When the work's all done next fall?"

BY SIMPKINS (the town marshal and trombonist in the W. C.T.U.

band), FRAY, his deputy, and the bounty hunters.

82 THO.RNTON FIRES AND C.L. STAGGERS, falls to one knee,. the

surprise.

Well, how'd you like to kiss my sister's

black cat's ass.

Harrigan fires. C.L. slumps, goes down on the other knee.

More bounty hunters burst into the room.

with bullets.

84 BUT HE TAKES THE MARSHAL, the deputy and one bounty hunter

85 HARRIGAN AND THORNTON LOOKING DOWN at the shambles in the

room, turn as:

AND IRATE TOWNSPEOPLE. BENSON, a beefy redneck rancher,

curses bitterly as he crosses to Harrigan.

We're holding you -- your whole damned rail-

road responsible for this carnage --

Mr. Benson...o

(almost screaming)

Innocent people are dead ...women

mangled -- dying --because you used

our town as a battlefield; You're

going to pay, sir -- your-railroad

is going to pay for our blood;

(blowing up)

Without the railroad this place would

still be a lousy little pueblo, so

don't make any threats to me;

(topping him)

You can't ambush innocent people. on

our street!

We were preventing a robbery and.attempt-

ing to capture a band of outlaws...

You lured that gang in here... the rail-

roadts been blabbing about a big silver

payload for weeks;

We represent the law!

MORE IRATE CITIZENS BURST INTO THE OFFICE. Thornton moves

through them-out the door.

88 IN THE STREET -- HE STOPS, looking at the dead and dying,

----your hired killers..

I can. assure you that there won't be

any more trouble... . My men will follow --

(cutting him off)

Your men enter this town again and

they will be shot on sight;

Thornton ignores them, slowly rolling a cigarette, looking

after Pike.

Harrigan exits, crosses to Thornton.

I pulled. you out of jail to get- that

bunch -- and you failed --

You gave the ordersl If you want the

job done right -- you keep the hell

out of it next time - You and the

rest of your railroad trash" I'll do

it -- but my way. - -

What.makes you think there'll be a

next time for you? What makes you

think you're not going back behind

bars for twenty more years?

Thornton's face twists as he hears again the clanging of cell

doors and the whimpering of prisoners..

Because I'm all you've got

(then, softly)

Because I know him.

(turning away bitterly)

Because you know I'll get him -- I'll

kill him rather than go-back.

90 REACHING THE BOTTOM OF THE ARROYO THE MEN SPUR their horses

side.

turns as:

93 ANGEL PULLS UP and calls to Pike.

Fijate.

94 BUCK, ON HIS HANDS AND KNEES, MOANS WITH PAIN as he attempts

to crawl up the slope.

95 PIKE RIDES DOWN TO HIM,. SWINGS OFF EIS HORSE and stands

looking down.

96 THE BLIND MAN, HEARING HIM,, gropes in his direction.

Buck lurches forward, grabbing at Pike who steps back, Pike

crosses to his horse, and painfully climbs into the saddle.

(dying, almost incoherent

with pain)

I kin still -ride...I can't see, but I

kin ride...

OVER BACKWARDS. He slides several feet over the smooth,

round pebbles of the wash, then is still.

Pike turns his horse and spurs it . up the slope.

100 THE MEN WATCH SILENTLY AS PIKE RIDES UP. and halts. They

don't move, all looking down-at-Buck.

(after a. long moment,

trying to cover the loss)

You boys want to move on -- or stay here

and give him a 'decent burial'.?

(the sentimentalist)

Well,. he was a good man --

He's dead!

And he's got a 'lot of 'good men? back

there to keep him company.

Too damn many.

I'd like. to say a. few kind words for

all the departed -- then perhaps a hymn

or two would be in order -- followed by

a' church supper with a choir. CONTINTED

(riding away)

Crazy bastards -- both of you l

Tector follows his brother, cursing..

101 PIKE AND DUTCH LOOK AT EACH OTHER silently -- try to grin --

finally make it -- then follow. The bunch is attentive, but

can relax a little..

Pike and Dutch are side by side.

,Ten years ago it was some shaky

drunk with a tin badge that hid

in the g1n mill till you cleared

town with your grab...Now, they're

c waitin'. for you --

With old friends. '

(pulling back to'

join them)

Old friends?

Deke Thornton.

I thought he was your partner?

He was -- but he got old and tired

and when that happens, things change.

'He changed -- you didn't.'

The following scenes will be superimposed over 101 and 102.

The suite consists of three adjoining rooms and is very

plush indeed,

TWO VERY BEAUTIFUL-YOUNG WOMEN in revealing night dress are

hindering more than helping, a somewhat loaded Pike Bishop

as he attempts to get into his clothes. The ladies are

giggling. and there is a great deal of grab-ass between the

three. -

101-B THORNTON, fully dressed and looking very sharp in his big

city clothes, enters from one of. the adjoining rooms.

ELIZABETH, a tall, lovely near-naked,.dark-haired girl,

follows him and takes his arm possessively. For a moment

both watch:

101-C PIKE'S girls'effectively stop his half-hearted attempts and

begin disrobing him.

Come on pardner, let's get out

of here. -

(Grinning at him)-

You.sound like you're all caught

up,

Caught up enough to know we've

overstayed our welcomes

(Suddenly angry)

What in hell is the matter with

you?

Stay -- please,

We've got money.to spend and

not a worry in the worlds

They're not going to look for

us in their own backyard,

How can you be. so damned sure?

He shakes off the girl, crosses to a sideboard, pours a

drink..

That's my business -- being sure.

There is a knock at the door and. Thornton whirls. Elizabeth

throws the bolt.

Hold it!

Relax -- just a little champagne

I ordered.

DOOR and gunfire fills the room as:

high on the shoulder. Thornton. is knocked sprawling... The

Deputy moves into the room (followed by three other men)

and fires at Pike but misses, as.

101-F PIKE SLIPS PAST the screaming women into an adjoining room.

The other men pursue.P.ike as the Deputy bends down and

snaps Thornton's wrists together with handcuffs. The sound:

of gunfire is heard from the street outside, then two of

the men re-enter the room. The Deputy looks up..

Get him?

The man shakes his head.

101-G THORNTON, HIS FACE TWISTED WITH PAIN AND BITTERNESS, makes

no attempt ato struggle as he .is pulled to his feet and

moved out the door.

102, THEY ARE SILENT, RIDING, EVEN LYLE is embarrassed by this

that.can hurt a man.

(after a moment)

Say -- I've heard it's like the.old

times in Argentina...3utch Cassidy

down. there making a killing...

Bolivia...but it'll be over there

too, pretty soon. Those :pining

companies will bring down a bunch

.of hardcases and Butchtll get his..

..Every one of us is worth a year of

drinking and whoring to any fool that

can read a wanted poster and carry a

gun.

Deke Thornton isn't just. any fool that

can carry a gun and read-a wanted

poster.

Fo -- but he takes a dim view of 20

more years in the Carcel --

don't bet on it..

Tector and I have been stealing since

the big depression and we ain't never

been caught. This Thornton don't bother

us nohe..

I don't really give a damn about Deke

Thornton...I just know that I'd surely

like to aet the hell off. this horse.

107 THORNTON-LOOKS AT HIM WHITE WITH ANGER, then .c ntrols it -

he is trapped. Finally, he nods and moves away, then stops

and turns back, his anger almost beyond any control.

Tell me, Mr. Harrigan.-- how does

it feel?

(as Harrigan looks at him)

Getting paid for it?

(stepping closer)

-Getting paid to sit back and hire

your killings with the law's arms

around you? How does it feel to

be so damned right;?

(after a moment, coldly)

Good, Mr..Thornton...it feels good.

You dirty son of a bitch.

(grinning at him)

You have 30 days to get him -- or 30 days

to Yuma. You're my Judas Goat, Mr. Thornton.

(motioning to the bunkhouse)

Use them -- lead them -- get Pike --

then kill them off. When you come back,

I: want all of them head down over a

saddle.

(pointing to the bunkhouse

All of them -a- head down over a- saddle.

(as Thornton starts to speak)

30 days.

Heturns and walks away whistling.

108 THE WILD BUNCH PULLS UP at the railroad which marks the

border and look out into Mexico.

Mexico lindo.

What's so 'lindoA about it.

The interior of the room is tawdry, disorderly and smells

bad. The bare walls are decorated with pin-ups from the

Police Gazette.

The men sit attentively on the bunks. and.foot lockers.,

Harrigan is marking beside their names in a large ledger

book. After making a 'notation, he looks up..

The hard money value of the men

killed less my commi.sson amounts

to. one hundred and fifty dollars.

104 THE MEN MUMBLE AND SHIFT. Harrigan holds up four wanted

posters. The bounty hunters move closer for a better look.

Bishop... .Engstrom... .Lyle and Tector

Gorch...are worth a total of four

thousand five hundred dollars -- and

you let them all ride outs

(after a moment)

Any one'of these pelts would not only

clear you with the company,.but would

mean a bundle of cash to raise hell

with.

Harrigan stands, crosses to the door.

How '.bout a little liquor money for

tonight, Mr. Harrigan?

There won't be any tonight -- you

move after them in ten minutes --

(turning back)

Get them -- get Pike and youtre rich.

(then).

But if one of you quits on me I'll pay

a thousand dollar bonus to the man who kills

him.

105 THE MEN SILENTLY BEGIN TO PACK THEIR BELONGINGS. Harrigan

106 HARRIGAN AND THORNTON WALK AWAY FROM the bunkhouse into the

deserted railroad yard..

Why should I let you go with them?

We've'been over that before, Mr.

Harrigan.

You could just ride off -- even join

him again -- you'd like that, wouldn't

.you?

What I like and what I. need are two

different things.

'Listen -- I don't want to go back to

prison, Mr. Harrigan,... .not ever -- but

it.has to be my way...

All right..

I need good men: You saw what happened

today.

You'll use what you have.

And you'll see it doesn't happen again

or I'll see you dead or rotting for -the

rest of -- you try

your life behind bars

to run -- I'll be after you and so will.

they.

I gave you my word.

We'll -see what it's worth -- five

minutes.

Just more of Texas as far as I'm concerned.

You have no eyes.

And he rises ahead with Pike and'Dutch across the tracks

into Mexico.

I knowed I wounded' three -- but

I wasn't sure about --

(as the others yell in

Jabali:...

111 JABALI, AN AGING NAVAHO INDIAN trots up to.him'.

This pelt should clear you up -- take

him back to town...and tell Harrigan

to get me a list of every Army garrison

and payroll schedule on the border.

(to.the.others, crossing to

his horse)

We got another half hour of light and

they might be just up ahead counting

their money.

A young boy takes their horses while an old.man and his

wounded son (the father of the boy) watch. Behind them,

an ancient woman pays no attention as she slaps tortillas

into shape. Two small children watch, big-eyed.

;113 THE MEN ARE QUIET WITH FATIGUE AS THEY DISMOUNT AND TIE. j

THEIR HORSES.. FREDDY SYKES, a skinny old man in tattered range

clothes, crosses to Pike as he unloads his saddle bags.

Them others ain't comin'?

No.

(after a moment)

None of 'em?

111 PIKE TAKES THE BAGS OUT OF THE CORRAL TO THE FIRE that burns

near an adobe wall and drops them on a poncho, watches as

the others do the same.

(joining him again; worried)

But I got horses and gear for all

them fellers like you said --

They won't need them -- we will.

Sykes thinks this over, finally nods. a little and turns away.

115 LYLE AND HIS BROTHER AND DUTCH STAND in a half. circle around

the poncho. waiting. Angel, the last, drops his saddle bag,

then crosses to the wall and drops down to rest. For a long

moment the men look down.a-t the pile of saddle bags.

About the sharing up...

The sharing up's going to be the

some as always.

(whining; pointing to

Tector and I don? t like the idea of him

getting the same as us...He's just

starting out and this is our stake for

new territory.

Pike looks at him silently. He has heard this kind of

argument many times in the past and it is obvious he is sick

to death of it. Lyle finally looks awa- at his brother;

And I figure a 'share to that old

man for watching the horses is a

share too much.

ll& PIKE TAKES A KNIFE OUT OF HIS BELT, opens a saddle bag,.

takes out a sack of silver, kneels to slit the bag open.

You hear me, Pike? -- I said it

ain't fair...

Pike stands,. flips the knife into the ground, faces the

brothers.

If you two boys don't like equal

shares why in hell don't you just

take it all?

They look at him silently.

MOVES OUT OF THE BACKGROUND, a buffalo gun now dangling

from one arm. The brothers tense. Angel laughs softly.

(almost a whisper)

Well,..why don't you answer me, you

dapnned yellow.-livered trash?

The brothers fide, et., look at each other.

Ah.--' Pike, you know...

(his voice a whip)

I don't know a damned thing except

I either lead this bunch or I end

it -- right now;

No, sir -- we divide just as you

say.

Pike looks at them a moment, then picks up his knife and

alicea open a bag and -turns it upside down and dumps the

contents onto the spread-out poncho watching as:

119 THE GROUP IS SILENT IN DISBEL'EF staring at the pile of

worthless steel. Hykes eases up, takes a cautious look.

Rings:, Steel rings!

(quietly).

Washers!

More-washers pour out. _

121 LYLE'S BOOT FLASHES INTO THE PILE. The washers fly in all

directions. Lyle whirls on Pike.

Washers...we shot our way out of

that town for a dollar's worth of

steel holes.

He kicks into the pile and scatters Washers across the

clearing.

They set it up:

(yelling).

Who the hell is 'they!!?

(laughing; cackling)

'They?': by 'they, are just plain

and fancy 'they.' 'They.'

(dancing around them his

high laughter splitting

the night)

Caught you, didn't they? Tied a tin

can to your tail -- didn't they?

Lead you in and waltzed you out -- Oh

my what a bunch -- big tough ones --

standing around with a handful of

holes -- a thumb up your ass and a

big grin to pass the time of day with.

122 TECTORSWINGS AT HIM, BUT THE OLD MAN DUCKS, then falls and

rollsaway, still laughing. Tector starts'to follow, Pike

stepsbetween them.

Railroad men -- Pinkertons -- bounty

.Deke Thornton.

(in disbelief )

Deke Thornton? -- He was with. them?

(as Pike doesn't answer;

How come you didn't know?

ALL TURN as the SOUND of laughter comes from behind.

.(to Tector)

Hey, gringo; You take my share.

126 BEFORE HE CAN DRAW ANGEL'S. EXPRESSION TURNS serious and a

gun is suddenly in his hand covering the big outlaw. Angel

smiles again...then pleads mockingly.

Don't kill me, gringo ...por favor...

Take my share of the 'silver' -- but

don't kill me, please.

Tector tenses, almost snarling with rage..

,k for it I

Tector-, looking at Angel's gun, half turns to Pike.

(continuing; softly)

Go on, fall apart!

Lyle and Tector hesitate, their hands on their guns -- Dutch

moves back into the shadows of the firelight, his rifle

drifting across Tector.

127 ANGEL SMILES AND SLOWLY replaces his gun.

hesitates.

129 TECTOR LOOKS AT PIKE, DUTCH, ANGEL, T.HEN slaps his gun into

from the weapon..

hands'it to Dutch.

Dutch sits by Sykes, takes a drink, offers the bottle to

Tector, Tector hesitates, then hunkers down and drinks.

Slowly the others.follow suit.

(as the bottle moves around)

What's our next move?

Maybe that damned railroad:

That railroad sire bsi hell ain't

getting 4ny easier. a

And we,ain't getting any younger.

For a moment, it looks like he'll get a smart answer in

return, then:

Lyle drinks and lifts the bottle to Angel who.crosses to.the

fire,. drinks and passes it to Sykes.

.We got to start thinking beyond

our guns -- theft days are closin'

fast.

(without malice)

All your fancy planning and talk

damn near got us shot to pieces

for.some lousy bags of washers...

Now this was goin.' to be our last

job before we head south ...We spent

all our time and money getting ready

for this.

You spent your time and money running

whores in Hondo while I spent my stake

setting it up.

LYLE CALMLY PICKS UP A WASHER, flips. it to (or at) Pike who

catches it, looks at it, through it, drinks, tosses it back

on the pile.

Looks like I'd have been better

off running whores than making plans9

stealing horses and buying uniforms.

1.32 THE MEN ARE SILENT FOR A LONG MOMENT. Then they break into

He breaks up and can't continue.

(his laughter growing)

,-While you was getting your bell

rope pulled by --

(standing; almost choking)

By two -- mind you, two -- Hondo

whores -- while Pike's dreaming of

washers - you're matching two of

them -- in tandem

And the wild bunch falls apart in laughter -- even Pike is

caught, but as he laughs, he knows that they are together

again.

How close you figure we are?

Not close enough... They're across the

border by now. -

Deke - you rode with. Pike -- what

(after a long moment; softly)

The best --

(after a moment)

And he won't be if you boys don't

learn your trade. -

How was it -- then mm

You know -- in the old days? I only

come out here last spring.

(after a long moment)

You can saddle up or shut up -- take

your choice --

(after a long moment)

"What will he do?

That's what I have to figure.

Maybe they'll split up.

No -- not 'that. bunch. They'll try

134 PIKE AND DUTCH ARE SIDE BY SIDE IN THEIR blankets listening

Yeah, I helped run a little copper --

nothing for us there except day wages,

if it was running now -- which it ain't.

135 PIKE FINDS IT.IMPOSSIBLE TO get comfortable. Groaning and

wincing with pain he shifts on the bedroll.

Why in the hell, did you ever quit it?

Why in hell are you still goin'?

I don.'t know"any better -- maybe

don't want any better,

(then, after a moment)

Hell, I wouldn't know what to do

with 'better' if it poked me.in the

eye with a sharp stick.

(laughing softly)

You -never gave it :a chance9 Pike.

I threw away more chances in one

year that you will see in your

whole.l.ife -- but that don't mean

you have. to ' be a damn fool like me.

Dutch sits up, rolls and lights a cigarette.

You got a halfway hard mouth, partner.

What in hell do you want me to-say ,-?

Just don't give me, no lectures..

They are silent -- finally:

This was going to be my last, too...

I'm not getting around any better --

like the red-haired lady said to the.

white-haired judge -- 'I only got so

many miles left -in my backside, Your

Honor, and I aim to keep it moving

while I'm still young enough to feel.

what it's there for.'

(a.s Dutch -laughs softly)

I'd like to make a good score -. then

back off. CONTINUED

Back off to what?

(as Pike doesn't answer)

Any real ideas for a next one?

Pike closes his eyes and leans back.

Pershing. has. got men spread over

the whole border. Everyone of those

garrisons is going to be.gptting

payroll.

That kind of information is kind of.

rough to come by.

(sitting up)

Well -- I don't figure it's going to

.be easy, but it can be done.

They'll be waiting for us.

I wouldn',t have it any other way.

136- MOST OF THE BOUNTY HUNTERS ARE ASLEEP, only'Thornton and Cof -

fer are awake. Thornton sits up,.begins to roll a cigarette.

If he's in old Mex -- do we follow

him?

No.

Why not ?..

He'll be back.

Harrigan ' said something about

thirty days --

(after a moment)

That's what he said,

You must have hurt that railroad

pretty bad -- they spent a lot of

time and money getting that ambush set

up for us.

(smiling at the memory)

Well, I caught up to them -- two or

three times -- There was a man named

doing things -- So I made him change

his ways -- when you do that to a

there-'s a hell of a lot of people, Dutch --

that just can't stand to be wrong.

Pride, I guess

I guess -- but they can't ever forget

it -- that pride that being wrong

or learn by it.

Well, I surely hope to God we did.

138 SYKES CROSSES TO PIKE, GIVES HIM a cup of coffee, moves

away,

Where'd you find him?

138 (Cont,)

.(softly)

That toothless old wreck was a real

gun about twenty years back --

used to run with Thornton and me

killed his share and more -- around

----Langery -- Ambushed stages all along

that old board highway.,.He had those

Swede immigrants so scared theyQd

starve rather than go to town and

by beans for their kids, and there

wasn't a sheriff in. the territory

to take issue --

He laughs, drinks the coffee and gags..

And he ain't changed -- only now-he

does his killing with a coffee cup.

Dutch laughs and then both lean back listeningas:

139. ANGEL, WRAPPED IN HIS SERAPE LEANING AGAINST THE-WALL, plays

the great ranchero songs of old Mexico.,

140 LYLE.AND TECTOR ARE ALSO AWAKE and listening.

(softly) -

Pike, I wouldn?t have it no other

-way aither.

1L.2 THE SAND IS LOOSE AND THE FOOTING EXTREMELY DIFFICULT as they

start down in single file, Sykes is last, he leads his own

horse, a pack animal, and three of the empties.

143 SUDDENLY SYKES SLIPS AND LOSES HIS-FOOTING. He falls

PULLING THE FIVE HORSES DOWN WITH HIM.. Unable to

control his slide he collides with/Tector who is next in

line. Tector's fall starts a p fain reaction in which

all the men slide to the bottom of ttLe hill.

145 PICKING UP SPEED THEY TUMBLE TO THE BOTTOM and land in

a giant cloud of. dust. There. is a: profusion of coughing

and swearing as the men and-animals struggle to their

feet..

146 TECTOR STANDS,. CURSES AT SYKES,. then picks up a. stone

and throws it at.the old man who is hit and falls

backward.

Leave him alone!

Hats goin' to get pis killed -- get

rid of him!

We don.'t get rid of nobody

we stick together -- just like

it used to be -- when you side

aman you stay with him --

(shaking him)

than some animal -- you're finished --

we're finished -- all of us!

Tector looks at him silently.

148 PIKE TURNS TO MOUNT THE HORSE. Placing his foot in

the stirrup he stiffly starts to swing on. The leather

breaks and. he falls under the animal. Landing on his

back, he lets out a loud shriek.

1.9 THE OTHER N'EN LOOK DOWN AT HIM AS TEEM MOUNT. Dutch,

help.

150 PIKE STRUGGLES TO HIS FEET. None of them move forward

to help him and he doesn't expect them to. He is

visibly miserable as he recovers the reins of his

animal and tears off the.broken leather.

151 LYLE AND TECTOR GRIN A LITTLE. Sykes turns away.

'Pears 'Brother Pike' needs help,

Brother Lyle.

Riding with 'Brother Pike' and old

.man Sykes makes a man wonder if it

ain't time to pick up his chips

and-find another game.

(suddenly yelling

at Pike)

How in hell are you going to side any-

body if you can't get on a horse.

152 PIKE LOOKS AT THEM, THEN STEPS onto the makeshift stirrup

and mounts, concealing his pain, taking a few seconds to

gather up the reins and position himself. In the b.g.,

Dutch swings onto his horse.

Were about two hours from the

Santa Caterinas.

He turns and rides toward the mountains, the men following.

That was a mighty fine talk you

gave the boys 'bout stickin' to-

gether.

(as Pike doesn't

That Gorch was near killin' me

or me him --

Damned old fool like me's not worth.

takin' along.

We started together -- we'll end it

together.

By God, that's the way I see it --

that's the way it's always been with

me...Sorry 'bout Deke - never

figured him that way,

(then, as Pike

doesn't answer)

Back in. San. Rafael -- my boy how' d.

he do?

finally:. _

Your boy2

C.L. -- Clarence Lee -- my daughter's

him -- you do -- just what Mister Bishop

says -- Did he conduct hisself well?

(after a long moment)

He did fine --

Why didn't you tell me he was your

grandson?

Well, you had enough on your mind

He had to pull his weight just like

the rest of us -- just wanted to know

he didn't let you down -- run. when

things got hot --

(after a moment)

No ---he did fine...just fine.

THORN TON AND THE BOUNTY HITTERS follow the wild bunch's

trail. They are hot and tired and with the exception of

Thornton,.. are apprehensive.

Coffer pulls up, calls to Thornton:

That culvert -- good place for them

----to make an ambush.

Go on - ride up and find out.

Coffer hesitates, his -ayes wide with fear. Thornton draws

his gun, pulls back the hammer.

Go onl

Coffer rides forward.

(to the others)

Next time I want advice from any of you

scum I'll ask for it -- until then, keep .

your mouths shut and do what y-ou' re to ld%

(turning back, calling)

All clear"'--

INTO the shade, the others follow suit.

From here on, its Mexico, Mr, Thornton.

Do we follow?

What's the closest town of any size2

Agua Verde -- maybe two or three days.

(then, pointing in the

apposite direction)

Juarez -- five -- six days hard riding,

What's in Agua Verde?

Headquarters for Huerta regulars.

fighting Obregon, led by an old time

bandit named Mapache.

Thornton thinks about this, then mounts and rides back in

the direction they have come from.

Don't-we follow?

No -- we wait.

How long --a Mr. Thornton.

'Twenty-eight days.

'156 THE BANDITS ARE RIDING under'a broad sky across through a

destroyed pueblo filled with silent ghostlike people, four

or five crying children, vultures and four men hanging

from a tree. In the distance is a high range of mountains.

Angel spurs his horse and rides up beside Pike.

(to Pike)

We're not going to find much down here.,

That damned Huerta' s scraped it clean.

(in Spanish)

May he die the death of a thousand

traitors.

, ( then)

My village is up there ...in those

mountains.

So --?

I wish to visit my f amily...I can do

it and meet you in Agua Verde a day

of ter you get there.

How?

Going this way, you will. have to turn

east when you get south of the range...

I-know the way to cross the mountains.

If you know a shorter way..': show us.

Angel looks away and is silent for several seconds.

Ashamed of having us meet your people?

Yes.;..They don' t know about zny life

when I am out of the village.

Pike and Dutch both laugh softly, then Pike pulls up at a .

watering trough and dismounts as his horse begins to drink.

Far as Ifm concerned, you can go,

(dismounting, joining

Far as I'm concerned -- he goes he

dontt come back.

That sounds right to me..

Looks like I'm outvoted.

Whatfs the problem?

Wants to visit his folks alone -- thinks

we're a little rank for his people.

14k.

(as Tector drinks beside

his horse)

I think he can go straight to hell.

Probably wants to get a bunch of his

_people and waylay us!

And take what?

Tector thinks this over, doesn't answer.

(to Angel)

How do' you want it?

(after a long moment)

I invite you to my village -- my home.

(then, looking at Tector

and Lyle)

Any violence -- any disrespect -- and

I will. kill you.

Tector and Lyle look at him without expression for a moment,

then:.

You got a sister?

...Yes.

I would be proud to.make her acquaint-

ance -- and. that of your Mama, too.

(trying not to laugh)

And your Grandmaw too, sonny...

Angel looks at them, then mounts, rides toward the mountains

158 THORNTON AND HIS BOUNTY HUNTERS are riding back past the place

where Buck died. The men are sullen,. some almost openly

defiant.

We go back with our tail between our

legs Harrigan will have our hides.

They'll be coming back -- and we'll

be waiting for them.

We was supposed to go after them --

Thornton reins up, looks at Coffer, who looks quickly away.

You have something to say?

Coffer instantly lifts his hands in submission and shakes

his head. Then, after a moment:

They say Freddy Sykes is with them --

you rode with the old man, didn't you,

Mr. Thornton -- you and Pike and the

old man?

But Thornton rides on and doesn't answer.

159 TECTOR AND LYLE ARE SEATED ON THE GROUND trying to duplicate

the intricacies oA a very complicated cat's cradle demon-

strated to them by ROCIO, the lovely bright-eyed 13 year old

sister of Angel. Both men are drinking tequilla, but both

are sober, entranced and completely dominated by the girl.

All three straighten as:

160 CARMEN, ANGEL'S MOTHER, CALLS from a nearby fire where she

Miha -- trigame auga.por los frijolesl

The girl jumps to her feet, hands both men a bucket (or olla)

and leads.them down the bank to the river. (The natural

beauty of this location should contrast with other landscapes

in the picture. This village and its inhabitants represent

a complete and green contrast to the arid world of the

wild bunch),

FEW FEET AWAY. Angel watches dully,. his eyes mirroring his

agony. Pike laughs softly, watching.

Hard to believe.

Not so hard -- we all dream of being

a-child again -- even the worst of us --

perhaps the worst most of all..

(looking: at him)

You know us, then --

I know myself only -- where I have been,

what I have done.

Like to ride with us, old man?

And for a moment, the old man's eyes flash as he watches:

162- DUTCH AND THREEVILLAGERS SHOEING a very small, very mean

16L. mule. All four have been drinking a little and are thoroughly

enjoying themselves as is the mule as he pitches and knocks

them all sprawling..

-- I am too old.

(almost cursing, indicating

.Too old even to ride beside this

ancient gringo.

Hell, you ain't so old; partner.

And the soldier. who shot my father

what was his name?

They were many -- who shot -- your father

resisted like a man and died like a man --

names in this matter have no importance.

(to Pike proudly)

I killed one;

I lie -- I ran --

Joe --'by God I like you. I like a

man who tells the truth.

And the leader -- how was he called?

(after a moment)

Mapache.

That is.name enough.

The Federal. troops they don? t.

protect you --

They were Federal troops; -- commissioned

by the traitor Huerta -- seven of the

village were killed --.our horses and

cattle and corn stolen -- all in the name

of Huerta, the killer of our President

Francisco I.. Madero -- In Mexico, Senor -

these are the years of sadness.

(after a long moment,

And Teresa?

Gone.

They took her?

No -- she went with them because she

wished to. She became the woman of

Mapache -- and others -- she went with

them laughing -- Drunk with wine and love.

Angel, knowing it's true, turns and moves away. Pike looks

after him.'

-So Angel lives with a dream -- while

Mapache eats the mango --

Just so -

You have been there -- with the dream?

Many times -- and with the mango too.

You just bet he has, Joe.

I never could carry a candle to you,

old timer.

(to Pike)

And. which do you prefer, the dream or

the taste?

I dream when I sleep -- and eat when

I'm hungry.

(laughing with Sykes)

Just so a -- the both of you and Map-ache

and I --

168 ANGEL, SOME DISTANCE AWAY, watches evening come upon the

quiet village and watches:

169 TECTOR AND LYLE moving from the pond carrying water, now

70 DUTCH AND THE THREE OLD MEN trying to pound a horseshoe

an the mule.

1.71 HIS MOTHER AND GRANDMOTHER AND other village women now

172 PIKE,. SYKES AND HIS-GRANDFATHER laughing in the ramada.

17 3 ANGEL TURNS AWAY, his eyes suddenly blind with tears,.

Then,-turns and crosses to his Grandfather..

Where is Mapache?;

'17L. THORNTON LEADS THE BOUNTY HUNTERS ALONG THE RAILS toward the

bunkhouse. They have been riding a long time. The men are

tired and bitter. Suddenly Coffer draws his gun and points

it at Thornton's back.. For a moment it. looks as if he will

shoot, then Thornton pulls up sharply,. and kicks his. horse

to one side as:

176 MOST OF THE VILLAGE IS gathered around three or four fires

- watching:.

177 TECTOR AND LYLE dance a Mexican Virginia reel as

178 SYKES BLOWS ACCOMPANIMENT with harmonica along with two

bashful, teachers.

You must tell me.- where Map ache?

laughing softly to himself, finally turns, his smile fading.

Why do you wish to know -- for your

father - or the whore?

Pike looks up as Angel fights within himself to find an

answer,

It doesn't make any difference, kid

our business is in Agua Verde

For a moment Angel looks like he will explode, then he

lifts a bottle of tequi.lla in salute to Pike.

As you say, Jefe - to Agua Verde and

'our business.'

182 PIKE AND THE-OTHER It N ARE WATERING THEIR HORSES under the

shade of several large trees in the main plaza of Agua Verde,.

The town itself is dull and sun colored like. the surrounding

country. Its most remarkable features are a great deal of

soldiers exiting and entering a cantina-like building and

a small, aging, ornate, church.

18 3 SYKES PURCHASES A TACO FROM A SMALL BOY and gums at it

while the contents run into his beard.

18. PIKE LIFTS A STIRRUP FROM HIS SADDLE on the hitching rail

away. a.

185 DUTCH LEAVES. THE BUILDING and joins Pike.

We'll go. have a drink, then try and

sell the horses.

'Who'.s going to buy -- looks to me like.

this place has been picked clean.

(joining Pike)

He's been here;

186 THE HORSES PUT THEIR EARS BACK and whinny nervously as an

incredible noise is heard off scene. The men snap their

heads.around and look at:

STREET towards the plaza. Inside is the almost ghostlike

appearance of a 1912 or 1913 touring car. Four mounted men

are riding on each side and a host of small.children are

running, screaming, behind it.

AND POLISHING. The mounted guards. take up positions around

the vehicle. The group shows deference to a large man

wearing general's braid. -EL 'MAPACHE. Next to him is his

second in command, ZAMORRA. The third man dressed in white

linen is MOHR, a German military advisor. With him is ERNST,

his aide.

189 PIKE AND THE OTHERS WATCH with interest as the men enter a

street, drawn to the vehicle. Angel is tense, knowing

that his man has arrived.

I seen one just like this in Waco...

Run on steam?

No...alcohol:...or gasoline.

190 FREDDY SYKES EDGES UP CLOSE TO PIKE. He is anxious to make

a. statement and he speaks to him as he walks around the car.

Pike... .I heard about one they got up

north that. kin fly;

Pike nods sagely. Te.ctor Gorch on the other side of the

car hears the remark.

.That was a balloon ,you damned old fool.

No,. the old man's right. They -got t em

now with motors and wings -- cover 60

miles in less than an hour...goin' to

use them in the war, they say.

(as T(ector looks at

him astonished)

This could cover. 30 miles in an hour --

' cording to the road, of course.

That could run a horse right into the

ground.

Not that easy -- these automobiles can't

stand.any rough ground -- or hot sun

like a horse ---they're for show mostly.

191 TECTOR TOUCHES A FENDER AND ONE of the guards spurs toward

him, cursing in Spanish. Tector backs off,. hands in the air.

I was just going to touch th.,e damn

thing, not marry it.

Y el dueno -- un general por lo menos.

(And the owner -- a general at least.)

Mapache? Mis que un general - un hombre

hecho para reinar todo Mexico, si Dios quiere.

(Mapache? More than a general -- a man

to.rule all of Mexico if God wills.)

You're here with us,pardner -- any

business you got with the general comes

after we finish ours -- and that is

selling horses..

(after a moment, shrugging)

As you wish.

He turns away, Pike grabs him, jerks him back,

You make.one move to trouble and I'll

-kill you -- understand -- we stick

together.

(before Angel can answer)

Angel -- who does this thing belong to?

(with due respect)

Es el carrazo oficial de.su excelencia

el Generalisimo Mapache.

Dutch turns smiling and tells the others.

The official carrazo of the Pache

Generalisimo. CONTINUED

Let's get some beer and talk to the

general about his automobile and our

extra horses,,.nice and easy.

The men turn and follow him into the cantina.

HACIENDA FILLED WITH MEXICANS wearing the uniforms of

Huerta,' s counter-revolutionary army and their ladies,,

A small mariachi band wanders among the. tables. playing folk.

songs of the era. In certain areas horses are stabled.--

a blacksmith shop is working, guns are being repaired, knives

and bayonets sharpened..,and food is being cooked for the

troops by their women. Kids, as .always,. are very evident.

19L. MAPACHE AND HIS GROUP ARE SEATED AT A TABLE which is in' a

covered area raised above the others. It is obvious from.

his position and respect accorded him that he is the local

.boss of the area.' The German officer, Mohr, and Ernst, are

'sitting on one side of him. Lieutenant Zamorra is seated

on the other side. Herrera is close by.

1.95. PIKE AND THE OTHERS MOVE TOWARDS A CORNER of the cantina

eyeing the Mexicans with the kind of caution that men who

are vastly outnumbered generally show.. They sit quietly

at a table, ignoring the suspicious looks of the soldiers.

196 AT MAPACHE'S LONG TABLE, the General and the Germans watch

them with pointed interest. Mohr nudges Mapache and asks

who they are. Mapache shr ugs -- he doesn't know,

197 EMMA, A PRETTY WAITRESS, CROSSES TO PIKE'S table to take

their order.

Diga?

Beers.. six cervesas,

Como?

Angel remains silent, looking at the General,

Seii cervesas.

The girl leaves to' get the order. The men at the table look

around the cantina. At a nearby table a group of men are

throwing dice and laughing loudly. The mariachis are gather-

ing around Mapache.. Lyle shifts in his chair to look at them.

198 MAPACHE IS LAUGHING AND DRINKING. The German. leans close

to Zamorra and speaks in Spanish.

Do you know these Americans?

No.

The German settles back in his.chair and. begins placing

a cigarette in a holder.

in the cantina. The other men tired from the trail only

half listen to them as the girl serves beer.

Probably talking about us behind our

backs.

200 DUTCH TURNS TO PIKE WHO IS QUAFFING a large beer.

a of the country ...He ought to have it

to spare.

Generalisimo hell -- he's just a damn

bandit grabbing all he can for himself.

Like some others I could mention?

No sir -- we don't.hang nobody or

torture them -- I hope the people

here kick him and the rest of the scum

like him right into-their graves.

MAPACHE, his eyes burning with hatred.

We will if it takes a thousand years:

Then suddenly, he reacts to the sound of a girl's voice off

scene.

Vamos:...te va. gustar el Alenman:

Angel. spins around in his chair watching as:

202 TWO PRETTY MEXICAN GIRLS, TERESA AND RASA, laughing and

giggling, pass-the table.

.Teresa;

He reaches out and grabs the better looking of the two by

the arm.

Hey,. boy...you know them cuties?

Teresa recognizes him,: then pulls away,

Llamo los otros!

No, Vete, ahorita vengo;

Pike and Dutch tense as Angel stands and jerks her toward

him, -

Let her go!

203 ANGEL LOOKS AT THE GIRL, furious and hurt..

Djaste el pueblo;

Si deje el pinche pueblo. Y ahora

vivo con el generalisimo;

She jerks away from Angel and starts toward the other table.

Angel. watches her go. In the b.g.,the group of Mariachis

playing loudly have moved around Mapache's table.. No one

there seems. to have seen the action.

Take it easy!

He places a hand on Angel's shoulder.

(to Angel)

Que pasa::

His sweetheart --

(still. watching Teresa)

"She was my woman and she left the

village.,

and begins kissing his ear..

Sure ain't your woman no more.'

Just look at her licking that, big devil's ear.

Angel watches, his rage growing, then stands -- Pike goes

for-him., .. but too late..

Put a!

In a split second he draws and fires.

and hurls her to the floor. The others at the table duck

for cover, their guns coming out.

into the side of his head dropping him onto the floor, knock-

ing him out. The others stand, hands an -theirguns,

Mapache and the'others slowly rise, look at Angel, now

realizing who shot the girl.

208 MAPACHE STARTS TOWARDS THEM. He pushes over chairs and shoves

people aside as he approaches the group. Zamorra9 the Germans

and other members of his retinue are close on his heels.

up to the'table and quickly scans the group.. Angel gets to

his knees9 Mapache kicks him in the.head and when Angel. falls

back, stamps him several times with his boot,, steps away.

One of Mapache's men starts to bash Angel's head with a rifle`

butt,. Mapache stops the man with a gesture,. then turns to

the others.

Qua basura es este?

Mapache again. kicks Angel..

Why did he try to kill His Excellency...?

He didn't, he was. after the girl...

Mapache is having difficulty understanding. He looks at

Z'amorra with a puzzled expression.

La.muchacha,..

Era su novia;

The Mexicans immediately respond to Dutch's explanation.

Both Z.amorra and Mapache smile.

His fiancee??...

He went a little crazy when he saw

her with you.

Mapache laughs. His ego is pleased with the idea that.he

had taken someone's woman. He turns and explains grandly

in Spanish to the rest of. the cantina.

Mato su vieja porque salio con El Mapache;

The soldiers in the cantina laugh and ad lib their response..

210 PIKE. AND DUTCH TRY TO SMILE as do the Gorch brothers and Sykes.

211 MOHR IGNORES them, looking with interest at the U.S..Army

.45 pistols that the men are wearing.

(.to Pike)

Are you men in Agua Verde for business?

Thought we might sell a few horses.

You must have been associated with

the American Army, is that riot so?

Tector and Lyle snicker slightly at the remark. Mapache and

Zamorra turn, listening carefully to the conversation.

The cantina is silent.

-No -- were not associated with anyone...

I see,..1 was curious because of.the

equipment which you are carrying.

(as they look at him)

That pistol is restricted for use'by

army personnel. It can't be purchased

or even owned... legally.

Is that so? - -

You're surprised at my interest?

(then as Pike doesn't answer)

Weapons are a specialty of mine.

Mohr bows his head slightly and clicks his heels barely audib3y,

I am Commander Frederick Mohr-of the

Imperial German. Army. For the last six-

months I have been in Mexico helping

fight against the revolutionaries.

212. ANGEL ON THE FLOOR IS CONSCIOUS, but uimoving., listening to

what is being said. Several of Mapache's men stand around him.

Unfortunately your government has chosen

to aid the rabble in their so-called

struggle for liberty...

I. never heard of any American troops

fighting down here...

They are aiding in diplomatic channels...

It would be very useful to us if we knew

of Americans who did not share their

government's naive sentiments.

We have vez"y'few sentiments in common

with our government.

Qua diga?

(Xn Spanish)

Generalisimo, I think we should ask

these gentlemen to have a drink with us.

And Pike, understanding. that much Spanish, smiles as we.

TRUMPET AS he looks at the body of Teresa being dragged

out. Emma and.Rosa'are still very much in evidence..

214 AT MAPACHE'S TABLE, PIKE, DUTCH, LYLE, TECTOR AND SYKES are

all seated at the raised table on the dais..,. Mapache seated

at one end is tired and looks half asleep,.

In the b.g. Angel can be seen still on the floor. A couple

of guards are sitting near him.

2,15 SEVERAL MARS. ARE SPREAD OUT on the table.

Emma and Rosa crying softly, watch as the dead body of the

girl. is dragged through a door at one end of the room.

Zamorra is seated.next to the German listening intently,

Of all those garrison rail spurs that

ofie is the easiest to hit -- But I've

got to figure where we can get out with.

the wagon.

216 HE POINTS TO A PLACE ON THE MAP, looks at Dutch who shrug,

doubtfully,

(to ZRmorre)

Why do you want us to

hit a train that's so close to the

border ...The General could take an

army up there and get it.

President Huerta is anxious to better

relations with the U.S. -- not destroy

them. -

Arms shipments are generally. kept secret

...how did you find out about this one?

Mapache has a superb intelligence force..

(indicating Mohr)

Organized under the supervision of my

superior officer.

(drinking, laughing)

Gentlemen., we are quite well organized

and well able to pay $10,000 in gold.

(asa they react)

If you are not able to do the work we

will find someone else,

I -- we can do 'it , , ,

But we're going to need special equipment.

Our accountant will arrange everything.

(smiling at Mapache)

Soon you will be the best armed general

in Mexico.

Mapache raises his glass In a toast,

A la conquistat.,.

Pike nudges Lyle who raises his glass; the other men follow

suit. Mohr smiles and elegantly raises a drink.

Prosit:a I

217 PIKE AND DUTCH.DRINK, put down their glasses.

With your permission ...I need a bath.

With my permission -- You all need a

bath.

Well,. .I don't need no bath...Tector

and me need'some of them senoritas.

(to Zamorra)

How 'bout that boy, can you fix us up?

Porque no?

Zamorra yells to JUAN. JOSE, an aide, standing nearby.

Oye!...Traeles unas viejas! Andale!

Gentlemen, you will excuse me, I'm

sure.

I'm sure.

219 DUTCH FOLLOWS PIKE TO ANGEL where they lift him off the

floor.

We better get him cleaned up...

220 MAPACHE CROSSES QUICKLY TO THEM, drawing his gun.

Por favor, General -- but I need him.

I"give you someone much better.

I choose my own... withyour permission.

Zamorra joins Mapache, looks at Pike whose hand is close to

his. gun, turns to the General.

Mi jefe, deje que se lo lleven..

Mapache replaces his gun.

Take him. It is not important to

me -- take him!'

Then he.looks away as:

and LUCHA. Lyle and.Tector turn.and react with delight.

Hey! ...Here come our sweeties!

(laughing softly)

More than enough to go around...

(as one girl sits

on his lap)

And then some!

He turns" and beckons to Pike and Dutch who, with Sykes, are

carrying Angel out of the saloon, but they ignore him.

SCHEDULES. MUNITION SCHEDULES AND NAPS. The other bounty

hunters are scattered around the car grumbling about the

inaction.

And you want to gamble everything this

one shipment will be attacked?!

- --they'll go for.

If?! Why not Juarez?

Because we would have heard::.

(then, patiently)

If they are in Agua Verde they will have

seen Mapache.

And.who in the hell_is Mapache?

A killer for Huerta who calls himself

a.general.-- with enough guns he can

become a power in northern Mexico -

my guess is Pike will try and get

them f or a him.

The train will be guarded by regular

troops!!

Not regulars --.green recruits and not.

worth a damn! I'll need twenty trained

men -- not recruits or this gutter trash

you.'ve given me.

You'll get the job done with what you

have -- that'p our bargain.

(then looking at the

Twenty-four days.

GENTER OF AN ADOBE STEAM HUT. The structure is about twenty-

five feet in diameter with a small. open oven in the center

surrounded by a great deal of rocks. Light comes in through

a tiny hole in the center of the ceiling which also allows

smoke to escape.

PIKE, ANGEL AND DUTCH are sitting on a bench against one

wall. Angel has been cleaned up, but looks beaten.

225 SYKES IS IN ONE CORNER, thoroughly enjoying himself.

The men are all nude and stark white against the mud.' color of

the walls. As the woman exits, Dutch stands and empties a

bucket of water over' himself -and the others. They all gasp

with relief. All have towels around their waists and none

are completely sober. Pike's leg is heavily scarred and he

is in pain. He stands and drinks, gets closer to the fire9

massaging his leg.

I don't see how you stand it

Some day I'm going to build me one of

these and live in it.

(then to Angel)

I don't know why I a didn' t just let him

kill you.

I'm not going to steal guns for that

devil to rob and kill my people again.

Very 'noble .

I didn't see no tears runnin' down your

face when you rode in from San Rafael.

They were not my people -- nor yours --

Mexico.

226 ANGEL GETS UP OFF THE BENCH and dumps a bucket of water on

Then I don't go along!

227 PIKE AND DUTCH LOOK AT ANGEL through the steam.

One load of guns isn't going to stop him

from raiding villages.. You ought to be

thinking about all that money you'll have.

Take them a large bag of gold when it's

over.

A small bag.

Move them a thousand miles away and buy

them a ranch --. two -- three, ranches.

One -- a very Small ranch.

They'll never leave...You see, it's

their land -- and no one will, ever

drive them away.

(sblemnl4),

I'll drink to that sentiment -- and to.

228 IT IS LONG AND NARROW AND SHADOWY and Lyle, Tector and their

He belches, then looks about in awe at the huge casks.

Itm all for them dons'.

229 TECTOR SUDDENLY SWINGS A MATTOX ON TO a six foot cask

which rests on top of two others of equal height, it

bounces out of his hand. He draws his gun and fires as

does Lyle. Liquid gushes down.

229A LYLE STEPS UNDER IT, lifts his face, drinks, then drags:

his lady beside him.

(as the torrent pours

over them removing his

Have a dollop, honey -- there's enough

here for both of us.

And. she does, tasting the good wine:; laughing.

ANGEL PALES.. Both are ready to write Angel off. and forget

about the problem.

Would you give someone a gun to

kill your mother, or your father,

or your brother?

231, DUTCH LOOKS AT PIKE. Pike thinks it over. Both have.

Son -- twenty thousand cuts a lot

of. family ties.

No -- you gringos are no different.

I have seen how Lyle takes care of

his brother.

He takes the bottle, drinks, then throws it on the rocks.

My people don't have guns so Mapache

takes the food out of their mouths

and clothes off their backs. With

guns my village could fight, If I

could take guns to my people I would

go with you -- but not just for

gold,

232 THE MEN ARE MOMENTARILY SILENT. Angel lifts a bucket

of water, spills part of it on his head, passes it to Sykes

who drinks a little of the water, spits it out, puts the

bucket down, pours two bottles of tequilla into it,

drinks. again -- smiles, passes it to Angel, who drinks

and passes it on.

.Al]. we'd need is for El Mapache to

find out we armed some village...

Let him find out.' Mr. Bishop --

(as P i12ke looks

a t\ him )

You know as well as I there ain't no

way of collecting from Mapache 'cept

off a lot of dead bodies -- mostly

ours, the way he thinks.

Pike considers this -- looks at the old man, finally

nods .

I would take guns ...if Mapache found

out, you would say I stole them,

How many cases of rifles did Zamorra

say were in that shipment?

Twenty.

Give him one.

(after a long moment)

You can have one case and one case of

ammo, You'll give up your share of the

gold.

__-He'll have to show up with us. when we

deliver..,.

I' will:..

i. know. you will...

Then. they all turn as:

233 TECTOR AND.LYLE AND THEIR LADIES enter, somewhat wet and

stained with wine.

(awkwardly) '

I' d like. you to meet my fiancee.

(tears in his eyes)

They just got engaged.

234 FOR A MOMENT THE GROUP:is frozen,-looking at the.bride to

be, her bridesmaid and:the best man. and groom,.. then all

stand., together and bow.

Pleasure-, Ma' ain.

Tanto gusto, senorita.

Mucho gusto, senorita..

(softly to himself).

Son of a bitch.

Trot them on in, boys -- I' :m hell on

packin' mules, but I'm 'a delight with,

.a pretty girl.

Tector and Lyle and their girls look at him as both Pike

and Dutch nearly fall off the bench, laughing too hard to

drink their health as we:

WITH BARRELS) DRIVEN BY SYKES. The others are riding.

behind. The walls of the arroyo tower above the men.

Pike is tense in the saddle as the pain in. his leg becomes

almost. unbearable.

You never told me how you got all

tore up like that...

236 PIKE REFLECTS FOR A MOMENT. His face is almost white.;

Then he reaches in his saddle bag and pulls out a bottle.

He drinks, passes the bottle to Dutch..

I met a woman I wanted to marry...

INT. KITCHEN v NIGHT

of groceries and too much to drink.

236C AURORA STANDS WAITING FOR HIM. She is very beautiful and

very angry..

Buenas no the s mi amor.

Aurora swings and catches him full handed across the face9

the groceries scatter on the floor -- Pike bounces off the

wall,. looks at her, tries to grin.

Your husband due back?

No, never you are late -- two days

late.

Pike is startled by this, starts to protest, realizes it is

true, tries to make apologies. Aurora turns and stalks off.

236D -PIKE IS SHOVING POTS AND PANS AROUND, attempting'to cook

dinner, while Aurora sits watching stony faced until he

.turns away, then she can hardly keep from giggling.

You need help?.

No!

He picks up a pan with a hot handle, drops it, spilling hot

stew or soup on his foot, hops around cursing looking at

the shambles on the stove and on the floor.'

236DD AURORA STANDS LOOKING AT HIM WITH LOVE, then smiling softly

crosses to the side-board and pours him a drink. He takes

it, suddenly both are laughing.

Suddenly Pike embraces her and pulls her to the bed. They

begin to make love, then:

THE DOOR SMASHES OUN AND LUKE, a skinny bad mouthed Texan

steps into the room, a_double barreled shot gun in his

hands ready to fire.

AURORA SCREAMS and throws herself in front of Pike. Luke

fires, the charge killing her as Pike dives out of bed --

jumping for his gun on a nearby table.

LUKE FIRES AGAIN, the blast catching Pike across the thigh

and knee. Pike goes down. Luke crosses to the bed and

sits watching him writhing almost bleeding to death on the

floor.

She had a husband and I should have had

enough sense to kill him. He wasn't around

and I got careless. One night he.walked in

on us - - got her with the first shot. He

caught me here with the second then the

damndd coward turned and ran.

You didn't catch up with him?

Not yet but there-hasn't been.a day or an

hour that I haven't thought about getting

him - - he didn't want that woman he just.

wanted to kill somebody - - well, he killed

(Then yelling back)

Move along, Freddy - - we've got a long way

to go:

He turns back to Dutch, takes the bottle,.. drinks deeply and

puts it away.

This is the last go round - - this time

we do it right.

237 A TRAIN CHUGS ACROSS THE FLAT STRETCH of desert. The small

steam. locomotive pushes a flatbed and pulls a succession

of three cars.

Another flat, a passenger and a cattle. The train moves

toward the only object in sight:

THE-FLAT car, wearily checking the track for obstructions.

ON THE SECOND,FLAT CAR TWO MORE ARMED GUARDS sit on crates

of weapons and..arnmunition, gazing at the passing scenery.

The soldiers' horses are roach-maned and unsaddled. I

At one end of the car, the railroad livestock man is asleep

on a pile of straw, an empty jug at his side. The animals

of the bounty hunters are standing saddled, with the cinches

loosened.

244 THE TRAIN SLOWS AND A FEW OF THE SOLDIERS. lift their heads

and look out the windows.

their slumber.

245. THE BOUNTY HUNTERS TENSE.- THORNTON STANDS, looks out...

nothing,' but:

214.6. A RICKETY WATER TOWER AND TINY maintenance shack -- no horses,

wagons, nothing.

214.7 THORNTON TURNS back to his seat.

FIREMAN CLIMBS OUT OF THE CAB AND ONTO THE TENDER. He

reaches up and grabs the lanyard and lowers the spout.

A SAWED-OFF SHOTGUN: HELD BY ANGEL. The fireman gasps

and-takes a step back.

250 ANGEL SLIDES OFF THE SPOUT AND ONTO the tender. He covers

the fireman and the `two man crew. The- crew -urns and Angel

smiles aiid puts his .f_nger to his l 1ps, then gestures. The

firemanand the crew begin to take on grater,

PIKE, DUTCH AND LYLE step out 'from behind the maintenance

shack and climb swiftly onto the tender. Pike slips toward

the engine compartment.

252. DUTCH TURNS TOWARDS THE GUARDS ON THE flatcar behind the

engine.

253 LYLE SCRAMBLES AROUND THE ENGINE TO HANDLE the two men on

the.flat car in front.

He whistles an.d they look up. While he covers them:

255 ANGEL CLIMBS DOWN from the tender onto the flat car over the

crates toward the coupling Joining the flat to the passenger

car.

256 ON THE FRONT FLAT CAR the two- guards turn, freeze as Lyle

25? IN THE CAB, PIKE IS\STANDING WITH his hand on the throttle

25$. AT THE COUPLING -ANGEL GRABS. THE PIN and starts to pull on it.

259 IN THE CAB PIKE. WA TC HESi12 DUTCH , WHO WAVES HIS HAND, motion-

throttle..

263:: THORNTON- FROWNS AS THE CAR moves slightly. He stands, and

the. door, he sees:

263 THORNTON DUCKS BACK AND STARTS TO DRAW HIS . gun,..: pauses and

turns back into the car.' Silently he gestures to the

bounty hunters.

The soldiers in the back of the car continue to sleep as

Thornton and his men move past them toward the horse car.

REACHING THE SERGEANT, still snqring loudly, Thornton hesi-

tates, then decides against it and enters the horse car.

266 THE ENGINE AND. TENDER AND FLAT CAR PULL" SLOWLY away from

268 A 'MAN JUMPING A HORSE OUT OF THE CATTLE CAR. It is one of

the bounty hunters. Another horse quickly follows. Dutch

turns and yells.

They're coming;

269 GORCH ON FRONT OF THE. LOCOMOTIVE WHIRLS AROUND and looks

back for an instant as Dutch yells. The two guards jump

kills both as they pick up their rifles.

TENDER AND THE FLAT CAR, turning in the air, catching the

tender with his hands and his feet precariously balanced

on the coupling.

BACK OF THE TENDER. His feet are bracing him on the bounc-

- ing coupling. He is inches above the rail.

AND GRAB THEIR GUNS. They start .forward.

275 DUTCH LETS GO and, hanging on with one hand, manages to get

his gun out of the holster. He fires blindly over the edge,

IN TAE .CAB, PIKE .AND ANGEL WHIRL at the sound of the shot.

Pike instantly kicks the engineer and fireman out of the

cab, then turns toac'limb onto the tender..

(ahead of him)

Yo V07;

Pike hesitates, then turns back to the throttle.

27.6 DUTCH DUCKS AS SHOTS FROM THE GUARD splinter wood nearh=s

closer to' the rails.

Hurriedly, they enter the cattle car.

279 A3,. THEY REMOVE THEIR HORSES, SOME TRYING to resaddle in

the car.

28.0 DUTCH PULLS THE TRIGGER AND HIS .45 clicks empty..

The other guard panics and scrambles back over the crates.

A second shot catches him in the small of the back, hurling

him over the edge of the car.

283 ANGEL RUSHES FORWARD, and bracing himself on a stanchion,

grabs Dutch by the jacket and pulls him aboard.

284 THE RECRUITS ARE SCRAMBLING around outsi de.the car. Some

are climbing in through the open door. Inside the horses

can be heard kicking and neighing.

Order; Dammit;,..Corporal9 get those

---men out of that car, ..get the animals

(then, looking off)

Corporal -- ride back to the telegraph

at Todos Malos and tell tam that

Pinkerton gang has robbed the train

and we are in pursuit:

As the corporal mounts and rides off, the sergeant .contin"--ns

to watch:

286 THORNTON LEADING HIS MEN IS ABOUT a mile and a half behi^c.

the train.

CROSSES IT AND SUDDENLY the wheels lock. With a shower of

sparks it slides to a stop beside:"

288 A LARGE WAGON ON THE RIVERSIDE OF THE CROSSING. The

bandits scramble off the train and begin loading cases of

guns onto the waiting wagon. Sykes and Tector Gorch assist,

them. The wagon is directly beside the car and the unload-

ing is very rapid.

290 THE CLOUD OF DUST OF THE APPROACHING BOUNTY HUNTERS. He

yells down to the men:

Get the guns off and get on, out of here;

He turns and scrambles down inside the cab.

Outside the men quickly finish loading and the wagon pulls

up alongside the cab.

We're ready!

Not yet - I want to return e. favor..

He.ayanks the throttle into reverse and jumps off the

locomotive onto the wagon.

In the b.g.., the train picks up speed heading back towards

the scene of the robbery.

In perfect order Dutch and Angel begin attaching the ropes

to-the tongue of the wagon as Sykes unhitches.

29li12 WITH ANGEL LEADING, THE..HORSES ARE PULLED into the river.

Large barrels on the side of the wagon serve as floatation

gear. The current catches it and begins to swing it on

the rope downstream and across the river..

295 THE BOUNTY HUNTERS ARE RAPIDLY CLOSING THE GAP. In the

distance. they can see the bandits, now in mid-stream,

296 OUTSIDE THE CATTLE CAR, RECRUITS ARE LINED UP saddling

their horses.

78 e.

Sergeant; They're coming back...

(realizing what is

Get those horses away from the car!.

(running to the car)

Get them out of there;

Which.is now bucking, the saddle hanging under its belly.

The other rears as the Sergeant yells again.

Get out ; ...The engine's coming !

and runs.

THE CAR by the impact.

307 PIKE ROPES ONTO THE' WAGON FROM the front and pulls with

his horse.

308 SYSES IS IN THE DRIVER'S SEAT AND DUTCH is next-to him, lying

prone. on the wagon returning the fire of the bounty hunters.

309 LY'LE AND TECTOR ON HORSEBACK SPUR.up.to the wagon.

Get on those rear. wheels'.

The Gorch brothers scramble down into knee-deep water and

begin to push.

311 A MAN STAGGERS OUT from half cover and drops to his knees,

312 DUTCH FIRES AGAIN and another man drops. The bounty

bank. Then:

314A SEEING THORNTON STARTING ACROSS THE BRIDGE, PIKE raises

to move.

315 THORNTON FORCES his terrified animal across the tottering

he can see:

316 THE CAVALRY DISMOUNTING AND CONTINUING to fire.

317 THE BOUNTY HUNTERS WHIRL around and return the-fire.

But his words are drowned out in a volley-of firing.

Some of the soldiers start for the bridge. Three or

four of the bounty hunters quickly mount and spur on to

the bridge after Thornton.

318 THORNTON FORCES HIS animal forward, stops, recognizing:

319 PIKE AT THE WAGON. PIKE looks at him a moment, then -yells at

his men and pulls the wagon up out of the mud and labor s

up the slope,

320 ANGEL WATCHES THE FUSE BURNING under the bridge toward the

far banks where the bounty hunters are beginning to fall

back to the water:

321 THORNTON FOLLOWED BY THREE OTHER BOUNTY HUNTERS rides forward..

Angel lights the remaining two fuses, mounts and spurs after

Pike and the wagon.

322 SOME OF THE BOUNTY HUNTERS PUSH THEIR HORSES DOWN THE SLOPE Ta-

WARD THE WATER AWAY FROM THE SOLDIERS, who led by McHale, are

closely flanking them. The firing is general now.

323 THE WAGON GOES UP THE RIM OF A GULLY, then down the other

side and out of sight..

324 . IN THE COVER OF THE GULLY, DUTCH AND THE GORCH BROTHERS mount

3 PIKE TURNS HIS HORSE, SPURS BACK THE WAY HE CAME. At the top

325 FIVE STICKS OF DYNAMITE GO OFF in the shallow water on the

bles. A few bounty hunters struggle dawnstream,

326 THORNTON, TWO THIRDS ACROSS THE BRIDGE pulls up, looks back as

327 THE DISTANT FIGURES OF PIKE AND ANGEL. Pike lifts his hat i

a mocking' salute.

BRIDGE EXPLODES, blowing Thornton'and the three bounty

hunters into the river,

Finally both turn and ride after the wagon followed by scat-

tered ineffective shots of the soldiers,

GROUPED ON THE MEXICAN SIDE OF THE RIVER, still wet and dazed

from the river. A huge mesquite wood fire is burning in the

centre of came and several men have placed boots and articles

of clothing around it. Three horses, unsaddled, are tied to

a picket line in the b.g.

Sure would like to get ahold of my fool

horse,

SomeMex kid's probably ridin' him home

right now,

I don't see how I could'a lost both my

boots; .They always was hard as hell

to gat on but that little ole river just

sucked 'em right off;

aThat little ole dynamite helped some,

They was waiting for us.

Dollars to doughnuts that same kid

that's ridin' T.C.'-s horse is wearing

your-boots right now,

He-drops it onto the sand and stamps on it. The men watch9

silent, but slightly amused,

What do you reckon we ought'a do now?.

.,.Go back?..,Them soldiers was shooting

at us,

You see Thornton;.,. I never did see him

come up',

See him;... I was with him; But I never

seen him come up either,.

If you'reaasking me, I think we ought'a

go after them bandits and make that swim.

worth something.

(the fourth

bounty hunter)

I'd like to take some good pelts

back.. or at least maybe steal

something down here.

----Why go back at all -- just rob

every Mez' we see.

You don't know this country -- step

out of line and every Mex you see will

be shooting your ass full of holes.

T. Co

Well, I'm sure as hell going to steal

me a horse;

333 THORNTON IS STANDING ON THE EDGE OF THE CLEARING looking at

the men around the f ire. He is tired and has obviously ridden

a long way, and shows the affects of the explosions ripped

clothes, a bloody gash on his face -- a twisted knee that is

bad enough to make him limp through the remainder of the film.

Steal as some grub -- I got the

horses.

33. THE MENWHIRL AROUND AT THE s o and of Thornton' s voice,

Hey... you find my horse;

.We thought the dynamite must've got

you or them . soldiers.

Or that damned river.

"Them soldiers" are going to get us all

if they ever get the chance...Who

started firing at them?

The men look at one another momentarily.

Well, Old Huey started firing up.at

tem. I even tried to stop him...

Then one of them bandits nailed him

from across the river,

Them soldiers started shooting first:

Thornton, without answering, steps to the fire,

How many rifles? And how much

ammunition?

(as they look)

Got mine...damn little...twelve

rounds.azItm clean,..44ts but no

301 30 t s, . - . I}O round - lost mine.

We'll use what we got.

Are we going after-them?

We are; -- unless youtd like to go

back. and face a firing squad.

How, in-hell am I goin' to fight

without boots?

Your problem.

Saddle up -- we're riding out..'

In the b.g., a horse whinnies as the men look at him dumb-

founded.

Now...?

And they jump as we:

Lyle; .Put your horse in the traces!

336 LYLE HANDS A BOTTLE OF WHISKEY TO TECTOR and nudges his horse

forward.-As he swings off, it is obviaeas that he is a little

drunk,

And you better dry out -- we got no

cause to celebrate.

Well, we got all them guns,. Pike.

And we got a hell of a long way to go

'with a considerable number of people

just waiting to take 'em away.

Where's the General supposed to meet

us? -

Agua Verde -- or before -- and when he

What about Thornton and them others?

Last I saw he was ridin' four sticks of

dynamite into the river.

Don't count on him stayin' t.ere.

- (as Pike looks at him)

You know him --.I know him he'll

be along.

Yeah he'll be along.

338 HE CROSSES SLOWLY TO HIS HORSE, his weariness showing, puts

his foot in the stirrup, hesitates.

140 PIKE STEPS UP INTO THE SADDLE, the pain twisting his face.

For- a long moment no one moves, then:

LYLE FULLS. A BOTTLE out of his. jumper, hands it to Pike. 34-

Pike drinks, hands it'to Sykes who drunks, hands it to Angel

who drinks,. hands it with a touch of a smile to Tector who

hesitates, then half grins himself; drinks and hands it to

Lyle. Lyle looks at the bottle, upends it over his mouth, a

few drops spill out into his mouth, looks at the bottle in

disbelief, tosses it gently aside.

(to Pike , simply)

It'll be a cold day in hell 'fore

-I do that again. -

And suddenly they are all laughing.

Let's move.-

And they do, still chuckling-as we.;

342 A TELEGRAPH'OPERATOR SNAPS AWAKE as a message comes over the

wire..-. As the machine clicks, he diligently writes the mes-

sage. When he is, finished he hands it to JUAN, a' small.: boy .

who` is dressed in a poorly fitting uniform. -

Porel generalisimo: Andale!

The boy runs out of the building and into the street.

343 MANY UNIFORMED SOLDIERS ARE DEPLOYED AROUND THE TRAIN while

they load horses into old boxcars -- also loading are:

OTHER. CIVILIANS who are. part of Mapache's encampment, Most

climb'on top. of the box cars where they set up housekeeping..,.

building f ires, ' cooking food -- ignoring the sporadic rifle.

fire that is beginning to grow in volume as

345 THIRTY' OR FORTY BIG HATTED REVOLUTIONARIES probe for the

END OF THE TRAIN where:

347 MAPACHE'STANDS LOOKING OVER THE NEARBY HILLS with field

hit and falls dying.

Mi general -- tenemos que irnos.'

Par favor.

Mapache ignores them.

Juan,arushing'toward Mapache, almost falls as Herrera jerks

him to a halt..

Telegrama de San Antonio para su

exaelencia, el general. (A telegram

from San"Antonio for his excellency,

the General.)

(reaching for the

Yo to llevo;

347A JUAN PULLS IT AWAY. HERRERA.GRINS, and. understanding his

wish to: deliver it personally, steps aside. Juan runs to

Mapache, skids to a halt and salutes.

Mi General... telegrama de San Antonio.

The general returns the salute solemnly and opens the paper,

reads it.

Los-gringos se robaron el tren;

(to his companion,

Was sagt er?

Mohr smiles. Mapache is obviously pleased. He looks up at

the Germans.

The gringos take the guns...

Sie haben die Geware gestclen!

Ach so;...Gut -

Sehr gut.mein General!

(indicating the

approaching Villistas)

It is important this news be kept

from Villa until the guns are in

our hands.

(beginning to panic

as the firing grows

We must go:

(shouting towards

the mountain in

The next time I will. destroy you

(turning to Herrera;

in Spanish)

Send men immediately to meet the

guns on the road to Agua Verde --

take possession and return here.

And if the gringos object --?

Kill them.

(in English)

My General -- if they are success

ful in this venture possibly they

can be useful in others,

Mapache thinks this over, turns to Herrera. Nearby another

man is hit and falls.

(in Spanish)

Bring them back with you -- over-

come their objections -- reason

with them - convince them of our

good intentions.

HERRERA in Spanish)

And if they still object?

MAPACHE. (in Spanish)

Kill them;

3?+8 HERRERA SALUTES AND LEAVES. Mapache gestures:and the others.

quickly jump aboard the train. Mapache is the last, looking,

back at the hills with hatred as the Villistas charge and

we:.

349 DUTCH IS LYING PRONE BEHIND SOME ROCKS trying a paper cone

over the front of a pair of U.S. Army binoculars. Pike

stands beside him, With the cone adjusted he rolls over and

looks out across the valley plain broken with arroyos.

Still heading east.

Are they bluffing. or did they

really miss it?

I'd say they missed it..

(i 351. DUTCH AND PIKE SNAKE BACK FROM THE LIP OF THE ROCKY hill that

352 THE WAGON IS BELOW THEM hidden in a gully. The other men

are lounging underneath it. Pieces of brush are tied behind

the rear wheels of the wagon to brush away the trail. Pike

and Dutch stand and move back toward the wagon.

Only five left -- didn't figure

them to come down after us. How

much can we be worth?

A lot depends on how hungry they

are...

You- stay up there and look for

bighats.,..I'm going to start.

..'rigging the fireworks.

Dutch: turns, crawls back and lifts the glassese Pikewalk

down near the wagon and. prods. Angel., who.is sleeping _:

his boot.

1. need some-help.

353 ANGEL QUICKLY GETS TO HIS FEET and follows Pike. to the

wagon. Pike reaches into a box near the seat and removes

a piece of fuse.

Get that case of explosives near

the back.

Angel climbs on the wagon. Lyle, hearing him,.crawls out

from underneath. His brother also awakens and starts moving

around. Sykes, hat. over his eyes, looks up but doesn't move..

Whatta you want with the dynamite?

Protection.

(as they look at

I figure the General will plan to

collect without payment, then kill

us if we have. any objections. The

only reason he might change his

mind is if something could happen

to these guns.

Angel hands Pike a case of explosives.

Now I'm goin' to make it real

easy for something to happen.

35L PIKE SETS THE BOX ON THE GROUND and pries open the lid. He

begins setting the sticks on the ground next to the box.

Angel gets down and Pike hands.him a coil. of baling wire.

Wrap these in pairs and put a

fuse cap between them.

Angel takes the first two and starts to work on them.

355 LYLE WATCHES FOR A MOMENT THEN NUDGES HIS BROTHER and climbs

356 ANGEL AND PIKE ARM THE DYNAMITE STICKS in the shade of the

wagon..

Men from my village will meet

us tomorrow.

Pike looks up, angered.

You told them about our trail?

I. don't need to tell them...They

know where we are.

How?

Angel puts the charge down and looks off at the horizon.

This country has many people, but

they have learned to live without

being seen.

(aftera moment)

Anyplace where a farmer has a field

...or a man has sheep in the moun-a-

.tains..or a boy watches a herd of

goats.

- There is a noise off screen and they both look up,

357 TECTOR AND LYLE, using the heavy-bladed Bowie knives, have

Pike -- take--a look --

-You know how to work one of

these things?

Pike stands,,then grins a little-and crosses to the wagon.

.Whatever I don't know, I'm

going to learn.

359 THE BOUNTY HUNTERS NOW IN AN AREA OF BADLANDS have stopped

on a small rise and are looking out over miles of the same

type of country.

I don't know how we lost 'em

except maybe in that big valley

where the ground was. so hard.

There wasn't but one way they

could have taken a wagon out

of there, this here is it.

They didn.'t take it out...

We, ain't gonna make it too much

further without something to eat.

We didn't lose them -- I could

point to them now.

(as they whirl,

looking around)

Sit still, dammitl

(as they quiet)

You think Pike and old Sykes haven't

been watching us -- you think if we

hadn't.turned off they wouldn't just

have sat back and let us walk into

it -- six of them hid and all the.

guns.and ammunition they need -- you

think I wasn't sweating blood they

wouldn't try and hide their trail!

They look at him silently, almost frightened by his vehemeno e

They know what this is all about --

and. what. do I have -- nothin' but

you damned egg sucking chicken

stealing gutter rats -- with less

than 60 rounds of ammunition be-

tween you,

Listen, Mr. Thornton -- I don't

have to take any talk like that.

I don't neither;

You'll take it! You don't even

have enough sense to keep your

damned boots on.

(then, quietly)

We're after men' -- and I wish to

God I was with them.

(after a moment)

You make any more mistakes and

I'm going to ride off and let

you die.

They are silent looking at the ground -- after a moment,

Thornton turns his horse and rides off slowly. They follow.

Showing the wagon moving into a deep arroyo. Pike is now

driving.

361 SYKES IS AT THE REINS OF THE WAGON, PIKE BESIDE HIM. The

horses are at a walk. Angel, Dutch'are mounted,. the Goruh

brothers are lying on top of the wagon, one on each side of

a bulky tarp-covered object.

(looking off)

Hold up 1..

SOME DISTANCE AWAY. Seeing the wagon, they pull up.

363 PIKE SLIDES INTO THE FRONT SEAT NEXT TO..SYKES.. Without a

word,. Sykes lights his cheroot and Pike. reaches behind him

and takes the end of a fuse.

Angel and Dutch let their rifles drift over.

Mapache' s?

Just hope. they don't belong to

Villa.

(Note: He speaks English, but. badly, very badly)

Ho.lal...We are friends...We are

from. -el generalisimo Mapac hie;

Tell that one in front to come. over

here ...Alone!

Oyel Jefe, ven to solitol

The Mexican turns to his companions for a short discourse.

Then he turns and. rides toward the men on the wagon.

I.coming,..We are friends...

all of us...I bring love and

affection from el general --

We are comrades -- you and he

-- all of us.

365 PIKE, DUTCH AND THE OTHERS watch silently as he rides up to

the wagon.

366 HERRERA STOPS AND REMOVES HIS HAT', smiles, looks at. the

heavily loaded wagon.

Que bueno -- What bravery you.

have.to have done this magnifi

cent act for the liberty of

Mexico.

Angel laughs, spits, Herrera.looks at him for a moment,

smiles, shrugs, turns to Pike.

I am to escort you to the general.

367 NOBODY ANSWERS AND NONE OF THE GUNS pointed at him are

lowered, he seems undisturbed.

Tell me what is you wish?

(to Dutch)

Tell him to-come closer!

I hear -- I am coming,- my friend.

369 HERRERA STILL GRINNING BROADLY edges his horse closer to

the wagon.. Pike holds the burning end of the cheroot about

an inch from the fuse.

370 HERRERA SEES THE FUSE AND QUICKLY follows it back to the

371 THE WHOLE WAGON IS RIGGED TO BLOW, dynamite and fuse all

Itts-a: very fast fus.e..,any

trouble and no guns for the

general.

Herrera is solemn as he ponders for a moment, then begins

to 'smile.

Heyl...very smarts:: That's

very smart for you-damn gringos...

So nobody can rob the guns!

Nobody:..nunca nadiel

(after a moment)

Don't you think you should tell

your soldiers?

The Mexican makes a face as if he doesn't understand.

Why? I am not afraid,,,they

are not afraid -- you blow up

the wagon you die -- or we

kill you pretty soon -- but

we are amigos __

Now,

Show.him&

373 TECTOR AND LYLE JERK THE TARP OFF. TI MACHINE GUN. Lyle

arms it.

371k. HERRERA. LOOKS AT THE GUN and his eyes widen. He. turns,

Oyen muchachos3,.,Tienen la

.caretta como bomba.con unfisible;

,,.y machina38

Still smiling he turns back to Pike and Dutch.

El general. waits an Agua-Verde..,

to meet with you,

Go on back-and tell the General

that one of us will. be there

tomorrow for-the trade..1,any

trouble -- no gunsb

Herrera takes one last look at the guns. then he wheels his

horse and. rides off.

375 PIKE TURNS. TO THE OTHERS AS THEY begin to relax.

This isnAt over yeti

376 HERRERA RIDES HIS HORSE TO THE BEND IN. THE RIVER then,

reaching his men,areins his horse up and-turns him around.

He whistles loudly and calls out :

Muchachos...

377 FIFTY SOLDIERS FROM HIDDEN POSITIONS ON TOP OF BOTH sides of

the arroyo ride out and look down.

(after a.moment, laughing)

All the soldiers whirl and ride away.:

379 PIKE AND THE MEN breathe a sigh'of relief as. the Mexicans.

ride off . ,

(to Angel and Dutch)

Ride ahead a hundred yards and check

the washes...

(to Tector)

You and I will cover the flanks --

(to Lyle)

Keep on the gun -- watch the rim.

(as Pike steps off the

Give sue that cigar --

(.as Pike does)

Anything moves, I blow her sky high.

(sittinag up)

Listen, old man

I'll tell you when --

THORNTON 9 COFFER AND T . C. are down behind some rocks.

Thornton is looking DOWN THE ARROYO with binoculars while-

Coffer covers the glasses with his hat.

Movin' fast -- looks like they bluffed

off about 50 federal es --

(then sliding back)

Why due east?

(as Coffer shrugs)

Well, let's go find out.

(trying to conceal his hate)

Beggin' your pardon, Mr. Thornton --

but our stock needs water and grain --

and. so do we.

(after a moment)

I don't give a damn about you -- but

I.. do about the stock.

He turns and slides down. the bluff. Coffer and T.C. look at

each. other, then follow.

382. SUDDENLY TO AN OWL.'S CALL. He rises and crosses to Pike,

who is sitting near a tree with a rifle across his lap.

There is rjo fire, but enough. moonlight to see.

My people are here for the guns.

Pike looks at him then looks around the camp.

Where?

Angel smiles, then turns and calls softly.

Ignacio?...Quien hablas por mi pueblo?

Distinctly Indian voices answer from the surrounding tangled

undergrowth.

Si Angeleit o ...Soy Ignacio -a- Ya estamos 1

383 PIKE AND THE OTHERS MOVE INTO COVER, their guns coming out.

Lyle in the wagon traverses the machine gun.

(to the others)

They have come for the guns.

We haven't heard from Tectnr..

(from the shadows.)

Call-'em in.

Vengan, Muchachos

then suddenly:

385 A PEASANTS DRESSED IN WHITE is standing near the thicket.

Lyle and Sykes turn.

386 ANOTHER IS STANDING BEHIND THEM. Then:

BOUND BETWEE[1 THEM. As they enter the clearing, they

politely remove their hats. Soon there are five, two of

them are leading a 'small donkey. Angel crosses to them as

they group in the center of the clearing. All carry

machetes.

(his gun out, still

hidden in the shadows)

Cut him loose

388 ANGEL SPEAKS, LED BY IGNACIO, THEY QUICKLY FREE TECTOR and

hand him his weapons with murmured apologies. Tector looks

at them, whistles, softly.

Never saw anything like it -- never

heard Iem, never saw 'em..

(to Pike)

They apologize and ask you to forgive

them for their lack of trust but only

by caution do they remain alive --

Hell, I forgive them! I just want to

join 'em!

389 PIKE JOINS DUTCH AND THEY WATCH quietly.. They have mis-

trusted people for so long themselve,g they can understand

mistrust in others. Freddy Sykes laughs s.oi'tly.

390 ANGEL AND THE INDIANS cross to the wagonE:

(climbing on the -wagon)

Lievasauna caja de rifles.

(Take a case of rifles.)

(crossing to him)

Don't break that fuse...

Angel lifts a crate.

I won't.

Pike looks at Ignacio waiting to take the crate, the man's

machete glints in the moonlight.

They part of your village?

They are part of the village but not

from it -- they are puro indio --

and these mountains belong to them.

How long have they been around?

What ?

How long have they been following us...

close?

391 ANGEL EASES THE RIFLE CRATE DOWN, TWO PEONS TAKE IT. He

turns to Ignacio.

Cuanto tiempo nos sigas?

The Indian begins a big explanation in a dialect only Angel

understands.

Desde ante ayer, cuando salli-eron de la

llanura grande. Hey otros.grupo de

gringos... ellos se fueron a uno Ranchito.

Pike looks at Angel.

They've been. with us since we left the

big plain...He says those others went

to a little. Ranch.

(joining them)

Ever see anyone that could sneak around

, like these S

Angel uncovers a case of munitions and hands it down,

They fought-'paches for a thousand

years -- that's a sure way to .learn..

If they ever get armed and led, this

whole country'll go up in smoke.

That it will, son, that it will.

392 THE INDIANS ROPE THE TWO CASES ON THE BURRO. They work

smoothly, each man knowing his job. Angel. climbs down off

the wagon, murmurs a farewell to Ignacio and the others, and

they disappear into the shadows.

39LE. MAPACHE AND HIS MEN are playing with fireworks while they

wait for the guns.

ANGEL'S VILLAGE). One of them waves aloft a shotgun and

tells Mapache that it belonged to the man.. Mapache, com-

pletely absorbed in lighting a Roman candle, answers without

turning.

Matalo l Pues l.. .

-(Then kill him!)

As he dies, Mapache lights the Roman candle and shoots it

into the air, then at tha soldiers who run for cover,

398 THE GENERAL SEES PIKE AND CROSSES TO HIM IMMEDIATELY, laugh-

ing with pleasure. Mohr and the other-.Germans run to: join

him: as does Zamorra and Herrera.

Gringo 1. You bring the- guns l

Ya estan los gringos y las armas l`

(The gringos are here with the guns i)

(then noticing the wagon

is nowhere in sight)

(to Zamorra).

Donde estan las arthas?

Zamorra looks up at Pike.

The guns?

Don't worry we got ' em...hidden. As

soon as I. get 'my share of the gold

I'll tell you where four cases are...

$2500 worth..

The others are waiting at the wagon

and unless I r eturn pretty damn quick

they. blow it.

'Zamorra smiles, admiring Pike's caution.

You fix it pretty damn good. You

fool Mel

Our accountant will pay you immediately.

Zamorra turns and yells to Herrera.

Trae la caja!

(Bring the strong box!)

When you come with all my guns?

Quicker I get back, the quicker the

next load'll get here.

399 HERRERA BRINGS A SMALL WOODEN STRONG BOX. Kneeling on the

ground he opens it and counts out two small bags of gold,

and hands them to Zamorra. Zamorra hands them to Pike.

About two.. miles up the arroyo ... three

cases of rifles, one of ammunition,

are in the brush behind it.

(to Herrera)

Trae las armas

Herrera runs for his horse.

I understand you have a machinegun

Our contract was 16 cases of rifles

and 8 of ammunition -- for $10,000 --

not a machine gun.

Zamorra translates this for Mapache who beams at Pike. with

genuine pleasure.

(meaning it)

_dinero -- muchachas bonitas --

la vida dulcet

The General wishes you to join

him. -- and become rich he

respects you.

(turning to go)

I'll think it over.

Esperate.

'Wait, por favor...In case he

cant find them.

(to Pike in

(to Zamorra)

I trust him.

Zamorra shrugs, Pike grins then turns and rides out..

SHOW Tector Gorch leaning on the wagon grinning.

They are in,.a small shallow depression

between two hills.. High enough to provide a vantage

point of the village and the surrounding area--- hidden

enough by brush and broken country to provide maximum

cover.

402 SYKES SEATED NEAR THE ROCK picks glass shards from his

clothes, turns to Tector.

(after a moment)

Pike must have found you. under a

rock somewheres.

You going to whip me?

Nope - But you better hope I don't

get riled enough to start . ggin'

you when this is over.

You'll never get a chance to dry

gulch me, old man.

(grinning at him)

We'll see.

(to' Tector)

403 DUTCH, CAREFULLY EXAMINING TWO GRENADES, looks up as Te c for

Gorch. moves up the bank of the wash.

(crossing to Dutch)

He's been gone a 1 ong time

(then.)

What's t ha t? .

Grenade -a you pull this pin then

throw it and find a hole- From

what. I hear it gets the job done.

We could have used a fear of them

in San Rafael..

(calling).

Pike's co min 1

404 DUTCH GETS TO HIS FEET, putting the grenades in his jumper

pocket and crosses. to meet Pike, as he rides in.

{.calling)

Any trouble?

Just carryin' all this weight.

He hold's up two bags of gold.

He' gate it a...Look,. Lyle, he's carryin'

golds Pike -- I want to go next..

(to Lyle)

You and your brother take in the

next' load, and the machine gun -

'then Dutch and Angel. Sykes,. you

follow them and pick up the pack

horses...leave the wagon.

How's the, generalis imo?

Openin' boxes. like he thinks it's

Christmas.

406 MAPACHE WAITS AS TWO MEN BRING HIM THE MACHINE GUN, the

weapon cradled between them. Zamorra awkwardly feeding a

belt into the breech,. finally gets it ready to fire. The two

Germans are watching with amusement and disdain. In the b.g,f

Lyle and Te.ctor are. riding out the gate.

It must be mounted on the tripod...

Mapache ignores them,.' grabbing the butt of the gun.

Er ist dock verrukt

The gun suddenly.comes alive and the two men holding it are

bounced around the area by the wild. reco it .

408. THE GUN SWINGS WILDLY, MAPACHE HANGING ON -= his finger

locked down. on the trigger.

409 THE GERMANS. AND OTHER BYSTANDERS DIVE FOR COVER as bullets

clatter- through the area-. Finally the two soldiers, 'unable-.

to support it, let it drop to the ground.

continues firing. Now like a rivet gun driving bullets

into the earth,

411 DUTCH AND ANGEL ENTER THE COURTYARD. Mapache, Zamorra and

Herrera watching the Germans mount the. gun on the tripod,

turn; then Herrera crosses to his horse and mounts, waiting.

We brought the last of it.

who opens theca -- locks - it's gold.

Zamorra speaks to Herrera, who rides off with ten or twelve

soldiers.

(turning to go)

You can keep the wagon - we'll

take the horses.

Como no...?

TENSES. A group of soldiers are beginning to slowly close

the massive iron gates.

How many cases did you take 'from

the train?

Fourteen. We lost two on the trail.

(laughing, points at

Angel; in Spanish)

He stole them. ..He stole them for his

people. The mother of his girl told us.

I lost the girl, so now she gives me an

Angel.

APPROACHES,. THE HEAVY WROUGHT IRON DOORS begin to swing shut..

No lo matez b...Lo quiero vivo

into the wrought iron gate.

A group of soldiers pick him up and drag him back.

416 DUTCH SITS ON HIS HORSE UNMOVING, apparently unconcerned as

Angel is brought before Mapache.

Supieron ellos?

No S...Yo los robe mientras dormian.

(.to Dutch)

Ee took two cases when you were asleep...

418 MAPACHE LAUGHS, highly pleased at the idea of a Mexican

robbing the Americans.

(to Angel, in Spanish)

Next time be more careful who you shoot

-- the mother of your sweetheart became

angry when you killed her daughter. --

so she betrayed you -- que fam-ilia, eh? CONTINUED

(interrupting him)

I'm wasting time here.

(turning to him).

Y Angel?

He's a thief,-- you take care of him.

(gesturing at the gold)

Dame lo.

Wiat for? l We delivered.

Two cases short -- one bag, por favor.

419. DUTCH THINKS ABOUT THIS VERY. BRIEFLY, then tosses him a bag.

Un vieje Bien..

Yeah.

He turns and rides off, Angel watching him.

They got Angel... some people would betray

their mothers for two dollars and one drink.

Unhitch and bring the horses - leave the wagono

We got to get him out.

How -- ?

But. Sykes can't answer and Dutch rides off.

distance.

The others are. mounted at the bottom of a small ravine below

him.

(turning to them)

Dutch Engstrom...going from the village.

$1000 dead or alive.

Bet they sold the guns.

,,-Coming out one at a time.

i (then, crossing to his horse)

We'll get down at the bottom of the wash

and see if we can thin the odds a little.

He mounts and they ride off.

On a ridge above camp, using binoculars, they look across the

badlands below and at the town far in the distance.

Well, he had guts --

We're just lucky he didn't talk.

Yeah - he played his string out right

to the end.

He loved that girl!

Her own Mama turning him in -- just like

Judas --

423 PIKE LOOKS AT HIM A LONG MOMENT, then turns away.

How in hell. can we do that? They

got guns and 200 men.-.. Besides,

chances are he's dead by now.

_-No wag... no' way at all.

There's Sykes.

trots up the dim trail. toward the hideout.

1 27 THORNTON AND HIS HUNTERS, THREE. M O WATCH from the

the trail.

431 THORNTON CURSES AND RUNS TO HIS HORSE as the bandits open

fire.

PINPOINTS OF LIGHT APPEAR IN THE ROCKS ABOVE HIM. After a

moment the noise of firingareaches them.

.Dutch takes the glasses, watching.

433 THORNTON AND THE OTHERS SPUR after Sykes, firing.

434 THEN SYKES IS HIT and falls forward over the horse's withers.

435 THE BOUNTY HUNTERS THUNDER after Sykes.

(yelling).

I got him -- I got him.'

Thornton is silent, his face bitter.

436 PIKE GRABS THE GLASSES,. WATCHES THE BOUNTY HUNTERS ride after

Sykes.

,Maps the ?

Thornton - they got Sykes. He's hit bad.

Daum Deka Thornton to hell..

What. would you do in his place.

gave his word.

(turning on him,

almost yelling)

Gave his word to a railroad.

It'-9 his word2

That ain.'t what counts -- it's who you

give it t o l l

(as Pike doesn't answer)

We kin stay right up here and kick

hell out of 'em.

Pike turns and. looks over the camp.

No water.

Make a run for the border?

They'd be after us every step of

the way -- I know Thornton. No,

I'm tired of being hunted -- we go

back to Agua Verde and let the

General take,.. care of those boys.

You're'cra-zy:...He'd just as soon

kill us as break wind..

He's so tickled with the guns

he'll be celebrating for a week

and happy to do us a favor.

Thornton ain't going after us in

there. While they're busy pick-

ing over Freddy) we'll.'

take the back trail off this

mountain and head for town.

The others look at him silently. Finally:

We take our gold?

We take one sack to pay our way.

437 THE BOUNTY HUNTERS CRASH through the brush into a small

clearing, then split up, looking for tracks. The country

around them is a maze of rocks and thick mesquite and

chaparral. Sykes' horse, blood running. down its flanks,

is standing in the clearing,-grazing.

He can't be far.

Lots of blood over here -- then

it stops and no tracks.

We'11 find him. Ten dollars says

he's dead by now.

.It'll take us a day to find him if

he is -- if he isn't, he's holding

a gun on us right now.

438 THE IAN TENSE,-THEIR WEAPONS coming up.

We'll go after the others.

Just leaving him here? He's worth

money.

(softly, bitterly)

Jess, you come back tomorrow and

watch the buzzards. They'll show

you where he is -- you might even

get a pair of. boots.

Jess thinks this over and grins, then the smile fades.

But what if he ain't dead?

Your problem..

He turns his horse and rides away,. the others following,

439 SYKES, HIDDEN IN THE ROCKS and brush above them,aslowly

lowers his rifle and sags back. His leg is dark with dried

blood and he's weak. Around the wound is a crude bandage

made from his shirt -- with a tourniquet twisted tightly

above it. After a moment, there is a noise and he looks

away at:

AGAINST THE RAYS of the late afternoon sun, a machete

dangling from his hand.

PIKE AND THE OTHERS NOW MOUNTED, look over the camp.

If I. didn't bury it, I wouldn't know

where to look.

Come on.

They ride off. Fora longmoment the clearing is quiet,then:

443. ENERO, A YOUNG MEXICAN BOY steps out of the brush.

MAPACHE'S SOLDIERS ARE HAVING A VICTORY CELEBRATION in:tha

courtyard of the hacienda. A fire:is burning and pigs and

goats are. being barbecued.

445 MAPACHE, ZAMORRA AND THE GERMANS are sitting at the table..

446 TWO SOLDIERS LEAD ANGEL (who has been badly beaten) down into

the courtyard. His hands are tied, and he is, stumbling with

fatigue. They tie a long rope from his neck to. the pack

saddle of a donkey. One of.the soldiers calls.to Mapache.

Yaalisto, mi General!

447 MAPACHE.GETS UP FROM THE TABLE and crosses to the area where.

join him.

448 THE. SECOND SOLDIER steps to the animal and leads it at a run

around the. courtyard, Angel dragging behind it. Mapache and

the'others watch without expression.

L. 4:8A PIKE' AND DUTCH AND THE GORCH BROTHERS dismount and enter,

449. THEY MOVE INTO THE COURTYARD AND STOP, watching the animal

dragging Angel around. Finally. the soldiers. and animal stop,

exhausted, in a

corner of the yard and the soldiers return to their party

atmosphere. Angel lies unmoving.

I hate to see an animal treated like

that.

No more than. I do 0

Maybe we- could buy him.

They are silent for a long moment. Finally:

Just thinking about him is asking

.for trouble.

We,could use another gun.

450 MAPACHE, ZAMORRA AND THE GERMAN ADVISORS NOW GROUPED around

the fire see the men.

Los Bandi'dos Gringos...Come here,

451 PIKE AND THE OTHERS PUSH THROUGH the large group of festive

Mexicans towards the table. As they walk toward Mapache:

452 ANGEL IS DRAGGED PAST THEM by two soldiers and dropped in

front of the general.

You come for your friend?

Pike and the others stop.a few feet away.

I want to buy him back...

Dutch and the others look at him surprised,

I,'11 pay you his share of the gold.

We kept his share of the gold.

Oyen muchachos...'.Quiere comprar

el traidor este ;

- (Listen boys...He wants to buy

this traitor)

The soldiers respond with laughter.

How much?...He don't look. wotth too

much...Levantasel

Two men jerk Angel to his feet. He is groggy and unre=

sponsive.

Maybe he won't live too long'.

I'll give half my share to get him

back.

453 MAPACHE TURNS AWAY and mumbles something to Zamorra.

You've had your fun with him...

(cutting him. off)

El g3neralisimo is happy with victory!...

Zamorra grabs a bottle of tequilla ofd' the table and tosses

it to Pike.

Go and drink... .there are women in.

the village...But don't be foolish.

and change his mood.

454 PIKE HOLDS THE BOTTLE and looks at the table, seething with

anger. Then,. suddenly he calms.

Want to go hunting, General?

Mapache looks at him confused.

(pointing)-

Five government men out there -

Policio - they want the guns back.

Mapache turns to Zamorra who translates..

(to Herrera happily,

in Spanish)

Five gringos want to take our guns

Maten los..

S , mi. General. f.

He turns,'barks orders to his men, then mounts and rides out,

followed by twenty soldiers.

Goodbye,. Thornton.

455 ZAMORRA GESTURES AND JUAN JOSE crosses. to them...

Quieren muchachas?

Pike looks at Angel for a moment, then turns away..

Why not?.

The group moves through the celebration out the main gate

and into the village beyond.

HIS GLASSES as his men search the area behind and. below him.

Don't look like nobody was ever. here,

(pointing at horse tracks)

Well, they was.

Then they look up as:

458 PIKE IS SPRAWLED OVER A NATIVE HAMMOCK, drunk.. He lifts a

bottle of mescale and takes a drink.

459 ON THE FLOOR OF THE HUT A SAD BUT NOT UNATTRACTIVE WOMAN is

sitting looking at a handful of silver in her hand. In one

corner a baby whines as the flies bother it.

Through an open door leading to another room,.the drunken

voices of the Gorch brothers can be heard as they bargain

with DELORES, a very reluctant prostitute.

You said dos for two.

'cause y ou did real well, honey.

Doce -- es mas que dos dace para cada

uno. _

joining room.

461. LYLE GORCH LOOKS UP AT HIM BLEARILY FROM A HAMMOCK. Tector is

on the floor embracing the disheveled woman.

Pike watches them, weaving a little:

Let's get Angel...

462 TECTORaIMMEDIATELY REACHES.FOR HIS GUN and stands as if he

has just been given an important order by a commanding offi-

cer. Lyle rises more slowly, begins to check the.-loads in

his pistols.

Why not?

Pike turns and moves through. his room. Tector and Lyle follow.

Behind them the.woaian begins her complaints again.

SITTING WITH A'BOTTLE BACK AGAINST THE WALL listening. to the

plaintive sound of a distant guitar.. He.looks up as they

come out.

Angel?...

Yeah.

464 THEY CROSS TO THEIR HORSES, THEIR DRUNKENNESS LESSENING with

every step.

Pike and Dutch pull rifles. or shotguns from their saddle scab-

bards as do . Lyle.and-Tector,. then they move up the village

street..

STRONG around them that as they pass through the celebrating

soldiers, the song and the laughter begin to die.

466 MAPACHE, THE GERMANS, ZAMORRA, HERRERA AND SIX OR SEVEN of

their officers and a handful of women are seated-at a long

center table.. Food and liquor bottles are spilled every-

where, the mariachi band plays for:

466A CHITA, A SCARED, NOT UNATTRACTIVE GIRL who is trying to

please the general by dancing on the table.

At other tables are more officers and perhaps thirty or so

enlisted men. The machine gun mounted on its tripod is in a

far corner..

467 ANGEL LIES ON THE FLOOR, nearly unconscious, almost unrecog-

468 PIKE AND THE OTHERS ENTER THROUdH THE LARGE ARCHES and s. 'and

watching.

(half angry)

Hey, bandidos? What you want?.

Hey, this

(pointing to Herrera)

Dog lost those gringos you wanted -

but.we kill 'em tomorrow -- naw. you

go on and get out of here;

We want Angel;

Mapache stares at them without answering.

You are very stupid...very stupid!

rising. -

470 PIKE WATCHES UNMOVING AS MAPACHE PROPS up Angel from behind,

grins at them.

You want him..,?

471. ANGEL-BARELY ABLE TO STAND, REACTS with disbelief..

472 PIKE AND DJTCH WATCH without a movement, without a sound.

Take him...

473 TECTOR AND LYLE IGNORE MAPACHE, THEIR eyes drifting over the

Mexicans who are slowly edging forward,some beginning to grin.

474 ZAMORRA, STILL SEATED at the table pours himself a drink,

the clink of the glass against the bottle loud in the

silence. Beside him the.Germans rise slowly.

Mapache, still holding Angel from behind, leans over his

shoulder and whispers in his ear:

Vete, Angelito:..te esperan. los.

gringitos...

475 ANGEL STANDS FAST, then curiously he takes a step forward.

477 ANGEL'S FACE BEGINS to brighten with hope and he takes

another step,. then:

478 MAPACHE GRABS HIM.BY THE HAIR and his other hand flashes

across the boy's throat as he shoves Angel-into the Americans,

the blood splattering them from his severed throat.

.479 AS PIKE STEPS BACK TO AVOID-Angel's falling body, he draws

his forty-five automatic and fires twice into Mapache.

480 THE BULLETS DOUBLE HIM AND HURL HIM INTO.HIS MEN. As he

481 DUTCH.FIRES INTO THE TOP OF HIS. HEAD, then the room explodes

with gunfire.

,482 ZAMORRA AND TWO OF THE OTHERS scramble for cover while

drawing.

483 ONE OF DUTCH'S GRENADES explodes amongst them.

484 PIKE, FIRING WITH AMAZING rapidity empties his ,45, shoves

it in his belt, cocks the lever on the rifle, moving slowly

but steadily into the shadowed corners of the room -- kill-

ing men, firing, being shot at and hit in return.

485 DUTCH EMPTYING his .44, throwing another grenade, is hit,

his back.

486 THE SOLDIES HUNT COVER and die -- more pour in from the

487 TECTOR AND LYLE YELLING with the lust of battle charge toward

488 MOHR.REACHES THE MACHINE GUN, begins firing. Kills a number

489 PIKE KILLS HIM with his last two rifle shots and the German

490 THE GUN SWINGS, cutting a swath of death across the room,

491 PIKE: THROWS THE RIFLE. as he slips a. now clip in the .45,

whirls as:

.492 ZAMORRA PUTS three rounds into Dutch.

493 PIKE KILLS ZAMORRA AND HERRERA, then a soldier has driven a

495' MEXICANS CONTINUE FIRING AT THE AMERICANS from all sides and

the Gorch brothers, badly wounded,. but still on their feet

still are blasting away at them from the middle of the room,

then Tector, laughing, picks up. the screaming, terrified

Chita and, rushes the crowd, using the woman for a shield.

She tosses her head and dies as bullets slam into her soft

body, then he is.hit again and goes down on one knee.

496 A SOLDIER, UNSEEN BY.TECTOR', steps into a doorway. He aims

at Tecto'r with a revolver and fires Into him from several

feet away. The bullets tear into Tector and he drops the

woman and dances out into the room. As he is hit. from all

sides, he whirls around, seeing:

12th.

497 THE MAN IN THE DOORWAY, he fires his last shot into the man's

body. The man plunges forward screaming. Tector stands up

straight as bullets pour into him. Finally, he crumples fast

and falls,

:; 498 LYLE., HIT SEVERAL TIMES, SCREAMING WITH RAGE, standing over

Tector is wild-eyed, firing madly into the crowd. A bullet

splashes into his cheek and he runs..at. the nearest of his

attackers, firing, scattering them, killing most,

499 TECTOR RISES, CLICKS HIS EMPTY pistol at. the mob. A soldier

rushes him from behind with a machete and the cross fire of

his own men kills him as he swings the weapon into TectorPs

back. Tector falls to the floor,. writhing in pain, cursing,

pulling down a soldier, strangling him as he dies,

500 LYLE STAGGERS, BULLETS PUMPING into him, then falls - dead

501 DUTCH LIFTS A SOLDIER AND TOSSES him against the wall, then

falls as bullets cut into him. He rolls, then.crawls under

the tables dragging the useless lower half'of his body. Al-

thotgh in pain, he is grinning strangely. He removes a car-

bine from a dead soldier and. props himself on a bench. Taking

careful aim,, he fires and a 'soldier drops screaming-.and.

kicking. Methodically he aims and fires again, and again and

again, a man dying each time he pulls the trigger..

502. PIKE WATCHES AS HE TENSES, FINALLY JERKS THE BAYONET out of

his body, runs firing at five of the soldiers. who are rushing

the room -- kills two,. reaches the machine gun, pulls Mohr

away from the gun, ,jerks back the bolt. and staggers as a

soldier empties his pistol into him from behind, Pike him-

self turns and dies,

503 DUTCH SWINGS THE RIFLE, firing, crippling the soldier, then:

504 ANOTHER SOLDIER, HIS UNIFORM STAINED WITH BLOOD, draws his

knife and hardly able to move, falls on Dutch -- the weight

of the.fall-burying the weapon deep into Dutch's back.

Crumpled together, both.men die,

505 FOR A FEW SECONDS THERE IS STILL sporadic gunfire as the re-

maining soldiers fire into the bodies of the wild bunch..

Then it stops. A mortally. wounded man suddenly screams in

agony and writhes on the floor and dies. Another, pistol in

hand, rises, staggers to the gateway, teeters for a moment,

then falls, firing blindly into the. dust. Somewhere outside

the wall, a cur yelps and runs away into the night,

505A THE BOUNTY HUNTERS led by Thornton, ride through. It appears

deserted, _

506 IN THE COURTYARD A SMALL GROUP OF WOMEN wrapped in. black

robosas are burning candles and moving. among the dead bodies.

that spill out of the large room of the hacienda and into the

yard. It is a scene of carnage, blood now black in.the sun,

a million flies and the walls lined with waiting vultures.

There is no sign of soldiers anywhere.. A few of the bodies

have been dragged into the courtyard. Most, including Pike,

Dutch and the others, including Mapache, lie where they fell.

AND DISMOUNT, their horses snorting nervously at the smell of

blood and the stench of death. At-the end of the courtyard

where five corpses are heaped in a small Di13, a lone vulture

stands. patiently near them.

As the bounty hunters approach and the-.bird labors reluctantly

into flight, the men dismount.

Thornton, looking in through the broken wall, turns away.

Coffer and T.C. enter, whistle softly..

It's them.

You'd have.one hell of a time proving

that.a week from now, in Texas.

We could try...Hell, a pelt's a pelt,

it don't matter what condition it's in.

Picked clean -- not a gun on 'em.,.

Thornton walks slowly among the bodies.

This boy here's got some gold in his

teeth... .Let me see your knife, Coffer.

(crossing to Thornton)

em. _Hey, Thornton, should we load up?

(walking away)

Suit yourself,

We going to wait here for Jess or

meet him on the way?

But Thornton doesn't answer; reaching his horse, he mounts

and. rides away.

Coffer and T.C,. and Ross look after him..

(pointing to the bird

on the walk)

If Jess is counting on buzzards to.

lead him to. old Sykes, he's got a

long wait -- we got 'em all..

They laugh and go to work.

508 THORNTON COMES THROUGH THE GATE, ties his horse, sits down,

his back against the wall. Except for a dog and two.silent

women, the village appears deserted.

Thornton rolls a cigarette, begins to smoke it.. waiting.

509 COFFER, ROSS AND T.C.-ride out leading four pack animals, each

carrying a body.

Thornton looks up, he doesn't move.

You ain't comin'?

Maybe we better wait here for Jess,

----.No we 9.11 pick him up on the way --

I -want to-get out. of this goddamned

place -- anyways these boys will start

going ripe on us by tomorrow --. we got

to' move --

(then; to Thornton)

You sure you ain't coming?

Coffer shrugs and drinking out ofa half-full tequi.lla bottle,

rides off, followed by the others who ignore Thornton as

completely as he does them,

510 THORNTON HASN'T MOVED. Then from the. distance come three

slow-paced rifle shots -- Thornton sits up -- waits, then

there is a fourth -- Thornton settles back,

511. THE SUN HAS PASSED THE MOUNTAINS AND AS the light goes

a cold wind kicks dust across the empty street of the

village.. Thornton stands, looking off at:

IGNACIO;.and a handful of Angells compadres sit watching

him. They are leading the bounty hunters' horses, the

sacks of gold are tied to Sykes' saddle.

Didn't expect to find you here,

Deke.

Why. not -- I sent 9 em.back -- that's

all I said I'd do.

They didn't et far --

You the one that shot me?

Don't know -- does.it make any

difference?

(after a moment)

I reckon not.

What are;. your plans?

Drift around down here -- try and.

stay out of jail --

Well,, come along -- we got some work

to do --

(riding away)

It ain't like it used to be,. but it's

better than nothing.

513. THORNTON TAKES A DEEP BREATH, THEN HALF GRINS, unties his

horse, then mounts and follows.

